I haven't run across Saydrah's posts much in the last several months, although I used to run into them a lot more.  What's all the fracas about?
Neil Young - Prairie Wind.   Neil Young always takes care with production values, though his records are often stripped down and raw. This record, though, is very meticulous and rich, with sweeping strings, vocal harmonies, and horns.   Tom Waits - Real Gone.  A lot of creative and odd instrumentation, like all modern Tom Waits albums. There are a lot of awesome guitar tones and distortion in this and excellent use of space and natural room ambiance. Lou Reed - Ecstasy This was an ignored little record. It is the best sounding modern rock album I can think of. Sharp, pure drums. Clean, deep bass. Perfect mix and recording, aside from the other aspects that go into production.  Bob Dylan - Love &amp; Theft  This is the best sounding and best engineered album I've ever heard. Whenever someone gets new monitors, I always recommend this. Buena Vista Social Club - Buena Vista Social Club You can really hear yourself in the room with these guys. Old style, classic recording with far away mics. This is a masterful feat of production, in all that producing really encompasses, in tracking these old guy down in Cuba and bringing them together.  Pat Metheny Group - This Way Up Peter Gabriel - Up Neurosis - Times of Grace  Nick Cave &amp; The Bad Seeds - No More Shall we Part
Yeah, I was talking long run.
Wow, how many situations could that work for. 
&gt; It seems to me that abortion=murder is an oversimplification of this belief system  Of which belief system?  There is no "pro-life" belief system, since people hold that position for differing reasons.  I do take your point though... but it seems the answer here isn't to say "it's an oversimplification" but to say it only addresses one of several of the belief systems.  The "at least they made an effort" is just plain condescending and commits the same over simplification in the other direction.  &gt; The belief is more "abortion is the killing of a potential human and that killing is morally wrong except under the most extreme of circumstances."  That is one of the beliefs, yes.  But if my dad holds that position, he isn't saying it.  His belief as stated is that a fetus IS a life, not that it is potentially a life.  And this belief doesn't seem to change the effect of "If they love babies, why do they allow abortion for rape".  For my dad's angle, his answer would come from one direction (if he has one).  From the way you state it, the answer would come from another.  But either one has to explain something valid.  And just calling the question an oversimplification is doing so too early.  It's quite possible the person asking that question knows exactly whet they're asking (that there are multiple beliefs and the question means something slightly different to each of them), and is depending on the answer to tell them where to go next.  It's the handling of the answer that seems to me to be the important differentiator.  By calling it an oversimplification to ask it, you're assuming the questioner doesn't understand anything about the field they're asking about.  [and if that's the position you're arguing from, then you need to either clarify up front that they do understand, or acknowledge that you think the other person is stupid and stop the argument.]  &gt; But the fear of the pro-lifer is that the moment he admits the fetus is less than a full person, even slightly less, he loses too much ground to the person who believes the fetus has the same standing as a gold fish when it comes to its right to live   Slippery slope, sure.  But that's not usually considered a valid position in most forms of argumentation beyond emotional.  It's a valid fear, but it seems to hide a complication of its own.  If you can't explain where the differentiation is, then it's just plain deceptive to box the other side in and ignore the valid part of their argument/question.
Your research findings there are really shocking.  They don't seem to be widely known; do you have plans to make this info more public?
Show you ass, please, moon me. 
You sound knowledgeable about this but it so directly conflicts with the AP article.  After rereading the article I realize it's written very poorly; the information is there but it's pretty convoluted.   ---   I did some research and found a statement which directly backs up your position.  You knew this already but I'll [link](http://www.cnn.com/2006/POLITICS/03/07/patriot.act/) it for others, plus provide the most relevant quote:   *Three provisions of the renewed act would be reviewed in four years; the other provisions are permanent.*   After gaining a bit more info I'd say the people in this thread are seriously underinformed.  I learned there were 16 measures and most of those were permanent as of 2006 when Bush and the republican majority voted them in.  Of those 3 were up for review in 4 years (now) since they were the only non-permanent ones.   Some in the senate tried for increased privacy protections this time around but failed since they no longer have a supermajority, and they ended up voting **315 to 97** in favor.  So if people want to be pissed at Obama, that's fine, but also be pissed at the weak/bought-off senate.   The OP and the others in this thread made it seem like Obama single handedly decided it would be a great idea to extend the entire Patriot Act.  In fact he was following what our other elected representatives did (not that this excuses any of it!) and voted to extend **3 of the 16** original measures.   Once again we have a sensationalist headline which only serves to misinform the general reddit readership.  I'm not an Obama apologist, him and the senate both deserve crap for this. 
&gt;I discussed the question of whether a poor person who has no means of playing a game other than piracy should refrain from stealing it.  This is by no means the moral equivalent of a starving person stealing a loaf of bread.  And even in that case, it is stealing.
Congrats on the gold Canada.  Now get the fuck off my tv on thursday nights so 30 Rock is back.
&lt;flame-war&gt; Damn python. &lt;/flame-war&gt;
I was part of the group that did [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Jl0VWJdE01M) in world of warcraft. Good times.  My greatest griefing achievement was kidnapping this pve main tank in vanilla after they attempted the emerald dragons. They weren't big on PvP so they let us watch killing the dragon. It was midnight and 3 of them had just spawned. They put up 3 portals to get to the next one, but their gnome MT lingered. We kept him sapped/hamstrung/mindcontrolled in the emerald cove in the middle of duskwood for 2 hours while his guild waited for him to come join them, not being able to summon since he was almost constantly in combat. When got close to the exit we'd mindcontrol and jump him down, having one priest and two mindcontrol caps =D  His guildmates later told us he had broke down crying, having to get to school the day after (this was from midnight and foward) and was kicked from the guild for making them fail the other dragons. I've never been more proud of my online achievements.
well fucking played, Canada. :)   
I can't believe there are no Second Life stories...  I use to love fucking with people on that shit. Best game for trolling ever.
I give it two weeks. The appeal of curling will last longer. 
Whilst playing World of Warcraft during the release of the Wrath expansion, I noticed there were two separate achievements added to the game for ambient world critters.  One was "/love" a certain quota of cute little animals.. The other was to kill a list of ambient animals considered "pests". To avoid confusion with this, when ever I saw a cute animal.  I would "/love" then slaughter them immediately.  
Remote control servos + live view to laptop = best photo possible.
well as no on here has bothered to reply with a sensible civil answer, how about the rich and repubs hate the poor and the unemployed/underemployed and don't want to pay for their care
While I agree it's probably a bad idea to include it... goto is actually a really good way to implement state machines.  Hopefully, it will mean better support for parser generators and the like. A [Ragel](http://www.complang.org/ragel/) PHP target could be cool.
Where's your change now?
I did not enjoy this movie much at all. The "twist" was unexpected, but the way it was revealed was boring. It was a bit of a chore to get through this movie, it felt like work.  **edit**  The whole movie is like the bad last half of the otherwise excellent film Sunshine, on a much grander scale. It's a "space" thriller.
It won't be long til glenn beck infiltrates this group! 8)
Steve Langasek, who is quoted by this post title, is [Ubuntu's release manager](https://wiki.ubuntu.com/SteveLangasek). As jawnsy [comments](http://www.reddit.com/r/programming/comments/b7j9v/debian_refuses_to_package_the_embedded_php/c0lcq4w), he's not an accurate representative of Debian.
KrispyKrackers wasn't the only one who got involved early on, and many of us who did aren't mods. I can't speak for everyone else who got dragged in, but I was disgusted at the amount of hate that was being directed her *before* any proof of her Associated Content connection was posted.  Now we all know that she is paid for some of her submissions - but I still don't regret trying to inject some reason into the situation.
Seriously! That single action disturbed me more than any game. I wasnt able to finish the game on 'evil' after that. I had to reload the game to where I didnt have Zaalbar go ahead with it. They had/have an amazing way with building characters in their games. Loved Kotor!  Hope the MMO does the series at least a little justice, though Im not hopeful, given the track record of MMO's and actual emphasis on story/character building.
I was really hoping that's what the picture would be
I will find the proof. This did happen. Otherwise i wouldn't have posted. I am afraid of reddit sometimes.
Submitter, you owe me a new keyboard.  I just spat coke all over this one after opening that link
[Procedure Unveiled for Reporting Violations of the Tax Law, Making Reward Claims](http://www.irs.gov/newsroom/article/0,,id=176632,00.html)
For God's sake, don't cross the beams!
that is...beastly. Any redditor has an estimate of the distance between the shuttle and the jumpers?
At least 90%.
Bitching about people bitching, nice.
Glad you liked it :) I am from Serbia, but quite honestly, I don't like Belgrade. It's too big for me - I live in the city about 120 km south of Belgrade, called Kragujevac.
America is Canada's arse
Lol, no nothing wrong, sorry if you thought there was something wrong. 
It throws his motives into question.
Oh no run...........
Man, when I had a girlfriend...lemme tell ya, I was the best boyfriend ever, I think that's the problem.
Programming is math if you consider programs as formulas, as the functional programmers do. But what kind of mathematical education would it be where you didn't spend a lot of time learning theorems someone else had proven, and reading the formulas with which they did it?
I'm pretty sure Walletau was making a joke there, dude. 
And the photoshop-polished sketches you see today are only the tip of an artistic [iceberg](http://www.threepanelsoul.com/view.php?date=2007-07-25).
haha, all good mate. i just thought i submitted at the wrong time and it got buried.
***VOTING HAS ENDED-FINAL RESULT 6 FOR 3 AGAINST.***  &lt;a href="http://imgur.com/MUdCJ.jpg" title="Hosted by imgur.com"&gt;http://imgur.com/MUdCJ.jpg&lt;/a&gt; ***Motion passes with 2/3 majority. Thanks to all those who voted!!*** ***Note: Articles 1 and 2 are currently under review, with a public consultation on those particular issues.***
Shottas
Is that Jasmine?
Where do the unlock codes come from? The carrier or somewhere else?
Looking at kittenwar depresses me. People own and love those kitties, but people still basically downvote them. So sad. :(
I suspect there's also a bit if "Wouldn't it be cool if" being translated later as "fans demanded".
Is this relevant? It has no bearing on the veracity or value of his comment, and the necessity of anonymity for whistle blowing is overwhelmingly clear.
It sure does.
Ah, I see, thanks. As the visual component was virtually nonexistent, ie no graphs, text, action, etc, I just back tabbed it and listened.
Great Job Canada!! :)
Another one I used to hear strangely often was "It's not their fault they're black!" Oh, those poor bastards, born with such a debilitating condition!
Unfortunately, I still enjoyed it but the story was shit.
To clarify - do you disagree with the image being posted or with my comment?
I'm not sure how you would use a graph. Do you have an example of using a graph for planning?
Stop trollin'. Just 'cause you can't take no jokes. You know who else couldn't take jokes?  Hitler.
And I'll send it right back.  My problem isn't that they were 'used' as much as they were 'fried'.  You can smash a pencil into unusable bits, can't you?
Seems a bit high, but not terribly so. [This chart](http://earthquake.usgs.gov/earthquakes/eqarchives/year/eqstats.php) says 13K 4.0-4.9 and about 1,500 larger a year. Figure that about 3,000 4.5-4.9 a year that gives 4,500 a year. that gives us about 14 a day on average. Of course this was not an average week, you expect small quakes leading up to and away from a big quake. So instead of 100 in a week we had 260, about what we would expect for this week.
I usually like putting the close button on the complete opposite side of the window from the other two buttons.
Well, in that case, you should definitely be a mod.
PNS Syndrome
we were talking about... find out the fallout from this and let us know =p
She's getting paid by whatever company to be an active participant of reddit. I don't understand how all this stuff works, but people are concerned because she's taking advantage of her role as a moderator. The links probably explain it a little better.  That's about all I've got, I've started drinking and I'm not turning back.
We don't pay for their site, but Reddit is paid for us. We can make demands just the same as a result.
sorry i forgot to mention that i support the NSFW tag on all scenes of graphic violence war related or not
MSPaint ftw.
I'll karma-off with you.  Um, lower is better, right?  (And, no, I did not check.)
I am new to this site so I humbly am interested in working my way through the process.
I love it when a novelty account works out!
I'm sure this completely depends on the university.  For us, no.  However, any unpaid tickets would have to paid in order to register for classes for the next semester, get a a new parking permit, or even graduate.  For those who weren't students but still obtained tickets and didn't pay, we'd send off their information to a collection agency that would hound them.  We also had full state DMV access. 
+1 Informative
USA WINS!!! Once again WE are the best!
People cross the line in real life all the time without being punished. I don't know how being a mod works, but I don't see how downvoting all her past comments is going to force her to do anything. It just seems punitive, not productive. Wouldn't messaging the other mods in her subreddits accomplish more?   I agree with you, she should not be a mod. I don't care if she keeps the account or not. Actually I'd rather she keep her identity so I know what I'm dealing with. 
you mean high quality right?
&gt;To the first bit: I cannot disclose that.  Why not?
Seconded.  I was primarily a Digg user before Reddit was even created and jumped ship because of all the mod drama / power user crap that was going on there.  This is not good for the community and if you truly care about Reddit, despite your self interests, then you'd strongly consider stepping down as a moderator. Continue doing what you do...but DO NOT insult the community that makes up Reddit.
I wouldn't say 90%. More 75/80%. But she's right, you guys are shits.
Decadent but simple, these delicious scones are sure to add an elegant touch to any brunch or breakfast. And they are all plant-based, too, so no cholesterol to worry about.
Easy... Just get a sports bra that looks like [this](http://im.shoppingbank.com/p/1051/i/wafflebra.jpg)! :)
That's right.  It's trying to intercept the SAM that was headed towards the photographer.  You can't take out a SAM without a SAMM.
Update?
How did you submit this while reddit was down?
where is this letter?
It's almost like they think they're the master race. The bullied have become the bullies.
[Modemu](home.thequux.com/~thequux/modemu/.git) should do it for the Great Old Ones; I'm working on finding enough of a spec of 56k to add modes faster than 1200 baud.  Just run SLIP through it, and you'll be warbling away like the good old days.
This move is only going to make debian look like foolish children and hurt their overall credibility.
&gt;[4] ya okay this is pretty cool.. [6] this thing is awesome! [9] I LOVE THIS VAPORIZER, WOOOO  i love the transition haha
Orca whales are known to act in similar behavior.
Basically, your options here are give Clamchops some money in exchange for a reserve slot or switch over to playing on the Chicago server, which doesn't have reserve slots for anybody! (yay! :D)
Heeeeell no.
It's not a bug per-se.  There's a "patch" that's to add a flag to the build process.  They're asking that the base php package be altered to support something that currently isn't considered in scope.  Adding in the "patch" will open an entirely new sector of use that would need to be supported by the maintainers.  If it really won't increase the workload, volunteering to be the maintainer of the package means trivial amounts of work.  If it would, then the refusal to include it can easily be understood.
He shoots... he scooooores!!!!  Canada wins the Olympics!!!
haha, yeah i did not do that, wish i had now.
Yup, it is...
iReddit sucks ass anyway. You're not missing out on anything special with Reddit up or down.
What country?
I never said you couldn't or shouldn't comment.  All I was doing was answering your sarcastic question which didn't hold the same weight as the original rhetorical question posed by p3on.
Man on the moon motherfucker.
I meant it as a joke, as I actually do have healthcare, and decent teeth.
I am anonymous on the internet, thank you.
possibly, but i have an actual relationship. not a popular opinion on reddit, but a real multi-year, truly intimate relationship can be great. 
Yes, I agree with all you say, especially about the crappy "top tens". The one aspect where I see reddit has been improving is that before the frontpage used to be filled with crappy linkverse, Cracked and Collegehumor links. The oatmeal is the last vestige of that stupidity. 
...definitely my smile. Awkward.
You believe a former lawyer why??
Caprica is off to a slow start, to be sure, but after this last episode it has begun to rock! I think it is going to get the audience it deserves.   Did I mention I'm a fan? :)
I recall a website somewhere detailing the different kinds of ways things disappear and how to spot it. It could be deleted, it could be autobanned, it could be banned by a mod...I can't say for sure what would be the case here though. Maybe somebody can remember the page?
that's the problem with born again Christians, they often come back as themselves
Wouldn't that be gullible?
Here's a hug for all your hard work. Wait,I'm a fat hairy trucker. Let's get you guys a hug from one of our adorable-type redditors.
&gt; Everything that exists has to be caused by something, and anything that exists without being caused by something must defy all the laws of the Universe and be supernatural.  due you're just making assumptions, you do not know the "laws" of the universe/multiverse.
Bitter lady who lost the ability to have children blames men and tries to push underage agenda which is bad for most teen girls both on the health side and on the financial future side.
&gt;posted something flaming, then played victim when people reacted to it.  Flaming? If it were Barach Obama in politics I was criticizing, you think I'd get met with the same accusation of "troll?" No, maybe I'd get somebody saying, "well I disagree with you" and it's pretty bad when your subreddit makes /r/politics look good.   &gt;I really wish I could say you were treated unjustly, but your posts are far too aggressive and emotionally charged to defend.  Perhaps it is to show how emotionally charged everyone's infatuation with the "professor" is.   &gt;Secondly, people were very critical of Dawkins for his handling of the situation, contrary to what you think.  People critical of Dawkins? You mean it? And not retarded fundies? I'd love to see it.   &gt;Lastly, don't assume that people are accepting his apology blindly.   My point wasn't that he apologized, my point was now he's implementing this "approval" process of conversation on his forum. Anybody who knows anything about internet communities knows that freedom of speech is one of the best ways of fostering great discussion. You guys are the ones who made this all about his apology.
Is that what he actually looks like? Does he have a model for the eyes and everything?
&gt;We don't have to prove anything.  You do if you wish to restore credibility and trust in the moderating system. Of course, if you couldn't care less either way, then it's not an issue.
Fuck you. Play us for chumps and then try to make yourself the victim? Get bent, spammer.
Don't have a question. I just wanted to say i'm currently a dialysis patient waiting for a kidney and wanted to say congratulations man. =)
This is what I was able to find. http://i22.photobucket.com/albums/b345/DMCmaniac/CIMG2893.jpg Looks about right
Now that's what I call a prickly situation.
Wouldn't it be similar to an oz of hash?
Since a slow reddit exists that means that someone wished to make it. So the universe was invented in order for reddit to be slow. It's not 42.
The Netherlands
That's some douchie documentation you got there.  You know who else kept a lot of records? That's right, the Nazis.  Think about that next time you want to get your panties in a bunch.
My point is that somebody once told me  &gt; If humans evolved from monkeys why are their still monkeys  And then their ignorance seemed redundant.
Oh well Americans, this is what you get if you get religious fundamentalists in power combined with anti-people judicial system.  Fix it.
More than a figure, he's a legend.  A man that trancended his own time, and those of a thousand generations.  He's a sleeping giant willing to give everything forever for those who are not himself. I think those are the ideals we should all strive to live for. But yes, the name comes from the Space Wolves :)
This is why I always lean back, chew with my mouth open, talk about other dudes, and belch around my guy friends. Leaves no room for misinterpretation.
[This thread is finnished.](http://img.moonbuggy.org/if-someone-wants-to-finnish-it-up-a-bit/)
So the best thread got deleted all because of Saydrah?
I fucking hate overly negative posts and comments. 
I really dig this band, first heard them on one of the Bikini Bandits short films.
nope, we won. just made the struggle more epic.
One time, I was at this party... and I was sitting on the couch with Amanda McKinney. She was just sitting there, looking beautiful. So, I lean in to kiss her, and I realize I have gum in my mouth. So, I turn to spit it out and put it in a paper cup. I turn back, and Amanda McKinney throws up all over herself. I knew the moment it happened, it was a miracle. I could have been kissing her when she threw up.   It would have scarred me for life. I may never have recovered.
(1) Every president attends the Prayer Breakfast; only Obama (indirectly) meets with atheists.  (2) The disapproval of the handful of voting atheists doesn't matter much. The disapproval of the religious masses does.
Is the third option "Not bitching but still visiting because the admins are clearly aware of the problem" simply not viable, or what?
I think the funny part is where you believed him.
There is something wrong with violating the law. It may not be that big of a deal, but it is STILL a deal. You are gaining the benefits of a society (roads etc) and in exchange you hand over rights (such as not being able to smoke pot, etc) If you want to change a law in a society you are a part of, work to make it legal the proper way. 
Speak for yourself.
That was a private message, you can't see it on his userpage anyway. 
I don't care aboutwhat the user said. The way BEP responded made me think that was his justification for the ban.
Homobiterexualible.
and it's super fast, too!
TAKE THE TREE GNOMES OUT BEFORE YOU FRY THE TREE!  Their screams will haunt me forever
sorry - looks like i was wrong: http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/business/8541640.stm (two day delay)
That was kind of him to make the glass more noticeable for the next person
nexus one now that this kb works on it http://forum.xda-developers.com/showthread.php?t=624416
Quick tip: it's actually you writing the code so if the code is dirty guess what?  It's your fault. 
is this pic from an eastern european  state or russian ?
I didn't call you names.
Amen, brother.
I came to REDDIT to get riddet of Diggit...  The goons at Digg are caustic... Nasty people with no where or one to vent at...  It should've been titled menstral site...for people on the rag....I think some of them came to reddit with me...  negative energy is really lame.
I think you may be confusing the IRS with the ghostbusters. 
up voted for using Aggro. Even though i do not play any sort of MMORPGs or any such i know what it means and made me chuckle!
...said 'trollingisfun'
I don't do eating.  I may practice it more.  I tend to enjoy working with large wicks, fire breathing, and lighting myself on fire (white gas is great isn't it?).  I'm probably gonna order a bunch tiny fire wands in bulk and then practice some fire eating, it's always a good move during a show.
BINGO!
Also /r/politics
Spam every subreddit from A to Z with this question.
REDDIT IS SRSBSNS.
it was caused by haarp. 
Yeah, that's her. And, yes, I'm lucky as hell! Thanks
But those links are creative... theres a skill in writing a catchy title.
Well, kudos to the athletes/fans in the stands. The Canadians on my facebook are being extremely obnoxious joining groups like "I just watched Canada beat Americas ass" and such. Canada definitely deserves the gold and it was an amazingly awesome game. I'm going to start watching NHL now =].
Hehe yeah, here goes:  One thing I should make clear. The word 'wormhole' can refer to two things. Firstly it refers to a physical object on grid such as a stargate which you can jump through - I'm going to call that the 'wormhole portal'. Secondly it refers to the actual system that you jump into when you jump through a portal - I will call that the 'wormhole system'. If you don't make this clear it can get confusing.  Every wormhole portal has two sides, which is obvious since it connects two seperate systems. There is a side that we call 'static' and a side that we call 'incoming'. Each side has a different code which is a letter followed by three numbers eg. J244. This code can be seen on your overview as the name of the wormhole portal. The code can be used to identify what type of wormhole portal it is and what wormhole system you will land in if you jump through.  The 'static' side of a wormhole portal is a wormhole that always exists. For example the class 5 wormhole system that I live in always has a static wormhole portal to a class 6 wormhole system. This doesn't mean the wormhole portal is always in the exact same place in space; it just means that whenever it closes a new one will open up almost instantly. Every wormhole system has at least one static wormhole portal, sometimes more.  For example, a wormhole portal with the code H900 is a static that will always connect to a class 5 wormhole system. This means if you find a H900 in a wormhole system and it closes, you can be sure another one has opened up in the same system.  The other side of the static wormhole portal is called 'incoming'. This side will always have the code K162. Finding an 'incoming' means that a static from another wormhole system has randomly connected to your wormhole system.  To use our H900 example again here is what you will see:  (any class of wormhole system) H900 &lt;------&gt; K162 (class 5 wormhole system)   Because wormhole portals randomly connect to their class of wormhole systems, a system can have any number of K162's in it, or conversely, none at all.  So some wormhole systems can have a minimum of one wormhole portal in them. A maximum is potentially in the thousands but the highest number I have seen myself is about 8 - but I am sure other people will have come across more.  Each seperate type of wormhole portal has it's own 'mass limit' and 'maximum mass in one jump limit'.  This data has all been collected. The site I linked in the previous reply has a table showing all the different codes of wormhole portals. Or you can type the code into this handy little site:  http://igb.bluesuntrust.com/wormhole.cfm  That might be a lot to take in so ask any questions if anything is still unclear.
Nothing in particular, I just wish they'd shut up sometimes. Especially during the ceremonies.
I'd rather get excommunicated.
Title is accurate.
bummer...
than.
Can't disagree with anything there.
why are you talking about "quality of life" as if anyone denies it is better now. We are talking about paying for health care. That SINGLE thing. Did you ask about that SINGLE thing yet? It is easy for me to convey how little respect I have for your attitude. I'm asking you to do something SO SIMPLE and to just focus on ONE ASPECT of government intrusion. Of course there is more to fix on domestic policy because the federal government has their hands in so many things now and they've messed EVERY ONE of them up. People caring for people is a great first step. I'll try to post some figures for you, but honestly... the figures are the easy part... getting people to care for one another is the hard part so that's where I spend most of my energy these days. The way you are talking... you'll look at the figures and promptly dismiss them and then say I don't care about people...
&gt;you think that being smart has anything to do with caring about people?  I don't think it. I know it. Without compassion, all the brain power in the world is useless because it wont find anything worthwhile to focus on.
Even before reddit went down, I had lost almost all of my comments. All that I can retrieve are the comments I made today and the all of my postings. I seem to have lost the rest. I'm trying to access the page where it lists all of my friends and can't do that. Now that reddit is back up it still is the same. Anyone else having similar problems? How can I acess my friends list. I want to congratulate my Canadian friend on the hockey game.
It isn't up to the teacher to decide. Teachers are mandated reporters, and as [DJPho3nix](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/b7f5d/little_did_i_know_she_was_only_16_years_old/c0lchgj) aptly stated, they're mandated to report when there is a big age difference, whether or not they agree with it. The law even goes on to break down specific sexual acts (e.g., intercourse, anal, oral) and the respective ages of both parties that would have to be reported.  In this case, I would blame the system and not the teacher. Knowing the facts and deciding not to report is a HUGE liability and can result in jail time for the teacher. It isn't up to them to investigate, only to do their part and report.  FYI, I'm a student in the mental health profession, and this was drilled into our heads since day 1.
Audacity
And for a second I thought it was all a big Saydrah coverup.
I typed up a solution for you on your post on the math reddit, and then realized it was two days old, and you deleted it.  So now that I see you have other solutions, I'm going to post mine anyway.  SO THERE.  Your intuition is correct.  Summing up lots of little pieces of a function even has a name: integration.  Let's think of it in terms of dynamics.  You have an initial velocity, vi, of 5/22 ticks per second (1/4.4) and a final velocity, vf, of 1/12 ticks per second.  Assuming a constant acceleration, and that the initial velocity occurs at time = 0, and that the final velocity is at time = 21600s (6 hours), then that gives us:  vf = vi + at  1/12 = 5/22 + 21600a  a = -6.66*10^(-6)  So, v(t) = 5/22 - 6.66\*10^(-6)t at any time t.  Remember that v is in ticks per second, so if we integrate it, we will get ticks.  s(t) = integral from 0 to t of v(t)  [s(t) = 5/22t - 3.33\*10^(-6)t^2](http://chart.apis.google.com/chart?cht=tx&amp;chf=bg,s,FFFFFF00&amp;chco=000000&amp;chl=s\(t\)=\frac{5}{22}t-3.33\cdot10^{-6}t^2) with t in seconds and s in ticks.  Rereading your question, it seems that what you want is an equation to find t given s.  We could do that with the quadratic equation, or just make Wolfram Alpha do it for us:  http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=s+%3D+5t/22-3.33*10^\(-6\)*t^2+solve+for+t+when+s+%3D+886  And that will work for any position, just change the value of s at the end.  Note that it gives two possible values of t for any s; just ignore the one that is outside your time bounds (0 &lt;= t &lt;= 21600).  So, tick 886 occurs 4151 seconds in, or 69 minutes and 11 seconds.  Edit:  Looking over the other solutions given to you, I am convinced they are wrong.  Use mine.
Jumping cactus is some of the most evil crap ever.
You need to quit beating yourself over this, be prepared for the worst in every way possible. As the male that has been in his position, I will fuck your girlfriend. The only thing that seems to be a positive in your situation is that she isn't interested in sexual relations with him; as far as you know. Unless you put a ring on it, you may need to tone down any sort of possessive behavior...for the sake of having a healthy relationship and you keeping your sanity.  In your position, I would be fine with the situation until there is physical contact involved. I would also remain vigilant but act nonchalant, don't let him bother you in any way he means no harm unless he oversteps his boundaries without her consent.
I'm not a big hockey watcher but I decide to watch it at my local sports bar and I'm glad I did, I and the crowd really got into it and I enjoyed myself very much, I guess I will have to watch hockey from now on.
My thoughts as a Hawks fan supporting team USA heavily  "Well, at least Toews, Seaby and Keith have experience getting it done".  Also: If Slovakia and Hossa had won, we'd be 5/5 on Hawks coming home with medals. Batting .800 isn't bad, I suppose :-/
An attractive white man and gorgeous black woman walks into a crowded restaurant holding hands. As the hostess motions them to their table, a fair number of patrons began to sneak curious glances at the couple. As the handsome gentleman pulls out a chair for his beautiful counterpart, he's met with a few sneers from some of the restaurant goers.  
&gt; random dungeon finder  You'll get one though.
Hell yeah, say it loud and say it proud Canada....CORSBY!!  Umm...wait a minute.
You take that back or I'll kick you with my old dirty converse shoes and stare down at your twitching body through oversized pink sunglasses. Then I'll casually walk away with my ironic t-shirt and extra-large headphones.
How so?
&gt;I really don't understand why the libertarian movement instead focuses on what is the appropriate level of government intervention is...  Zero. 
I don't know if this is "proper" horror, but how about American Psycho? I couldn't even finish it.
It's s pretty simple process - if you're using something like Django or other Python frameworks, the best way to do it is using [mod_wsgi](http://code.google.com/p/modwsgi/).
I was agreeing with you :(
What, you mean you don't have reddit Gold?
the linked article is an example of energy eminating from the tectonic plate effecting the atmosphere.  Assuming that relationship works in reverse is like assuming that coasting your car backwards down a hill will create gasoline in your fuel tank.
ITS A FUCKING BOMB!!!
I have the knowledge to keep mine super-secure, but I really don't care too much and let anyone use it.  Never had any real issues because of it either.
she was hanging by her taloned feet from a ceiling beam of building #7's sub-basement when she deleted it.
Huh.
Don't freak out, PSN is down. It is no hardware flaw. Apparently it is wiping trophies of the game you are playing when you are booted but I can not confirm this personally. Everyone is getting the same error code.
Agreed.  I'm now over my visceral outrage and ready to move to either permanent outrage or acceptance depending on reddit or Saydrah's response to this.
Whoa I didn't even look at my downvote count until you mentioned it. WTF? At least hamflask understands grammar.
yea, I've tried meritline and dealextreme before and meritline is good for super cheap generic printer ink; deal extreme is cool for cheap gadgets 
Do people still play that? I've still got my massive collection of Graal files. I was a small part of a group that worked on getting private servers to run (GServer 1.39 and NW).
With your penus.
Thanks mate.
I watched it in the Edmonton Coliseum. They showed it on giant screens. There were over a thousand people in that building. It was awesome. My ears hurt and my voice is hoarse from screaming. 
Sadly I haven't been to QuakeCon since... 2006 was my last year, since then I haven't been able to afford it. Hopefully soon though I'll go again.
You know, you probably could of just got a virtual drive like Magic Disc and save the Syberia CD as an ISO image. But I suppose you're method worked too.
They did that because they didn't expect to win, and when we are out of our element, our natural response is to revert to the very basics of our culture...boasting...we are very good at boasting
I agree. I'm also a little unsettled by how much other moderators think that this is no big deal. It definitely makes me wonder how many of them are in on this racket as well.
&gt;Unfortunately, nearly half the American populace considers the bible to be 100% error-free with absolutely zero interpretation needed,  I'm going to go out on a limb and say you are wrong.
So that justifies your implication that anyone who finds this sample pack useful is an idiot?  If it's not your cup of tea, down vote and move on instead of being a dickhead.
While you in Kinko's / straight-flippin' copies.
Reddit doesn't seem slow to me... keep up the good work!  Sorry for the others experiencing difficulty though.
Acts 2:42  &gt; They devoted themselves to the apostles' teaching and to the fellowship, to the breaking of bread and to prayer.   Doesn't say anything about the womens being allowed to speak, allowing them to be insubordinate to men or to leave their heads uncovered for that matter.  Who were those 5 female prophets, by the way?
You don't have to give it for free. But it is scammy if you don't mention it and rope an ignorant non technical client in without specifying this up front.  If you point it out in advance of course they will want it and get to negotiate.  If you mention it at the end, they have no choice but to pay extra, but then you are scamming them.
So married homosexuals, they're in the clear?
I believe someone is pouting :(
Your proposal is what Microsoft used. It does not work because sort assumes that that x &gt; y is either always true or always false during the run of the sort.
Oh I was talking about doing your algorithm as a graph algorithm instead of a bunch of sequential if elses. It may be cleaner and easier to expand
Don't you tell me what to do!  I'm so mad I'm going to go scream my password at passers-by!
Okay. Confess. Who saw reddit was down and tried to go to reddit to see if there were any posts talking about it?
True, it was a great team, but they picked players who had won in the 2002 olympics but were no longer playing the same calibre of hockey (like Sakic and Smyth) and we lacked the speed, scoring power and chemistry needed on a great team. Had they picked players like Spezza and Staal at the time, we would have had a much better chance, I have no doubt.   edit: FUCK YES
Oh God!
I've dedicated 100's of hours to d2 scams; don't you worry yrself.
I thought they sounded like scousers whenever they said it. 
http://commonsenseoracle.com/2009/12/avatar-because-it-now-takes-300-million-dollars-worth-of-the-most-advanced-cgi-to-commune-with-nature/
And capitalism making millions 30yrs later on movies and tv-shows, acted by people who would never have the real sacks to fight a real one.
/sigh
Who said she didn't?
I had a concrete design professor that told us, "your degree is just an admission ticket into the profession."   No employer expects you to already be an expert your first day.  There are things that you can't possibly know about your new job - how to be a good manager, how to soothe an angry client, how to resolve conflicts.  They don't teach those things in computer networking class.  After spending my first few years on the steep part of the learning curve, then kind of treading water on the flat part, I can say that I was relieved when I changed jobs and got back on the steep part, outside of my comfort zone, because I could recognize by that point that it meant I was learning and developing as an engineer.  
If you liked this game, you're going to love the Stanley Cup Playoffs.
I've been there six months and only a white belt.   The beginner's class can be attended by anyone, but the advanced classes are $100/mo vs $85. The MMA/No-Gi classes are $115. Most people pay $115 and just attend anything/everything they want. I think they have this structure so that people interested in trying it out can do so for less than $100/mo, which is the cheapest I've seen in the area.   They also have a no commitment structure. Most schools in this area that I researched before choosing this one require contracts and cost more than $100/mo. 
&gt;Videogame dystopia, this is a *totally awesome* view of the future.  FTFY  I mean, if I can get "Life Points" (or whatever they would be called) for doing annoying things, then maybe I'll enjoy doing those things more.
you'll be back
Don't get him banned, but DO go into random comments sections speaking of questionable sex acts.
Both languages have very similar syntaxes, but the libraries are very different, and I missed Java's when doing C#.
Upvoted for truth. Whether he's a 10 second or 10 year account should make no fucking difference to the validity of the fact that **SAYDRAH IS SHOWING A BLATANT CONFLICT OF INTEREST AND THE MODERATORS ARE LOOKING THE OTHER WAY**.  Nice to see your priorities are straight, BritishEnglishPolice. I'll take a leaf from your book:  You seem awfully defensive. What are you getting from Saydrah to divert attention away from them?
Goatse - the very mention on his name invokes a facial reaction
Why novelty in itself though? What is artistically valuable about something that no one has done before? Don't you think it requires some other criteria for greatness?
I believe it's in ~/.wine/drive_c/windows/.
Haha! That's actually quite clever. I've never encountered that.  I assume that if the parking officers found that to be a consistent occurrence, they'd track the meters and look into it.  I know that our department would probably have several people stalk the meters (we had some honest to god crazies working for us...).  But yes, that's intentionally defrauding a meter.  Depending on how crazy the university is, I know that my university would probably try to seek legal action against the person. At the very least academic judicial action as it's (as I said) defrauding a meter.  It's basically like skipping out on paying a toll booth or such. To answer the last part, if I personally saw it happen, I'd probably go ahead and contact my supervisor.  Mainly because it could cause ME to do more work in unjamming meters.  It would depend on how disgruntled I was at the moment. 
See, and I find that ridiculous and kind of insulting. Obviously I don't know the whole situation, but if I have a good friend, of course I want to hang out with them, regardless of their gender. You make it seem as if you were only friends in the first place because you were interested in dating.  Also, you say she was perfectly aware of your feelings (and maybe she was, I don't know) but we are not mind readers. I've had people who, after they left college or moved away, wrote back to me asking why I never reciprocated their attentions. The only thing I could answer was that I had no idea they were interested.
it's some kind of a profit deal
And what a kiss-ass mofo you are.  If something is fucked say it is fucked.
Haha, very cool, man. I think if I'm going to get something it will be this vape. Can you tell us anything more about it? How big the bowl is, what your battery consumption is? Some pics would be great.  EDIT: Also, more description on the conservation aspect of it would be great. Mmmkay?
The article in french which was published a few days after this blog post doesn't talk about rumors anymore but about hard facts, backed by sources and evidences.
Well now thanks to the gold, i guess it gets closed for the rest of the week ahah
I'm not quite sure that's true.  Zero government intervention would be the equivalent of anarchy, would it not?
Yes, all the time.  I do everything for my friends.  I do them favors, buy them gifts, and provide emotional support.  I always ask them how I can be of help.  However, whenever I have the tiniest of favors, I'm ignored.  It hurts.
Seriously, stop linking to this shit. All you're doing is giving them views which they will then brag about.
ever so kind of you!  So glad you decided to share some more shots... and quite honored that you took some inspiration in my suggestions!  That main photo of your new post is quite delicious!! Hope you get to play around with a few more?! :)
Nice. Thanks. I couldn't find anything of the sort.
Does it seem even slower for anyone else?
well, at the end of the day, they are a business (especially given conde nast), and they do owe us customer service. even more so given that our content is what they're selling.
Shit happenes
You guys should go to starbucks.
I suspect it's another SEO type who is pissed off that Saydrah is doing a better job then he/she/it is
This is possibly the most interesting thing I've read on reddit in months. Thank you for your attention to detail.   I've noticed the attitude from Saydrah/Lisa Droesdov a number of times, but I never understood why...now I do.   Thanks again, SirOblivious, you did a noble deed today.
I'm quite happy you guys hold the record now, alone. Quite a nice ending to a wonderful olympics. I started them bitter towards Canada but was rooting for them by the end.
You should know americans and australians can't spell anything the same way.
Indeed.  Transparency is the difference between "oh, ok, they're working on it" and "SWEET BADGERED JESUS REDDIT'S F-ED AGAIN".  Reddit and Github both seem to get this really well.  I have no doubt that running a huge, highly transactional site like this with such fast user growth is damn hard work.  Keep it up, fellas.
You pig! I bet you euthanized your weighted companion cube faster than any other test subject.
&gt;you should provide those files and then establish some form of contract where you continue getting paid for continued use of the logo  You won't get a single client if you pull that bullshit.  The Nike logo person was not screwed.  They were paid for the hours of work.  Why would they have a right to any Nike profits?  A salaried employee at nike does not own anything they make at nike.  A factory worker does not own the shoes they assemble.  Why would a logo designer be different?
[Source and more](http://www.cracked.com/funny-2665-company-logos/)
I'd say, I'm a bit more amused by this youtube comment:  &gt; Ubisoft can go suck at﻿ least fifteen if not sixteen cocks.
Well done admins! You rock!  *chocolate?*
Blog spam.
And maybe you could have ended up there as well. Since for tiny Germany, you'd think it would be hard to control the entire world once you took over it.
I know that the sun in that picture can't hurt my eyes, but for some reason I still don't want to look directly into it.  
The protesters were disruptive as they walked out of the church.
Problem ?
The correct plural is 'dominatrices'. I'm not usually a a spelling nazi, but I'm quite fond of that particular one.
The milk idea is great. Try experimenting with other foods, too.  Alternatively, try using it as an improvised, high-speed gold panner?
Even if we hear from them, it would take thousands of years before we receive the answer to our next question.
It was only broken for you - we were all here talking about you and laughing
I guess, I like the first one a lot more but I did enjoy the latter.
Chillville used to be the bright point of working on Sunday mornings.  The only thing that changed is I don't have a job where I can listen to the radio during that time anymore.
I tried to [fix](http://i.imgur.com/zjnp1.jpg) somethings others had mentioned. 
I have 9 of these in my system (overkill actually, but hey, too much cooling just means the room can get hotter before you can't use your compy anymore!) and I would say they are as quiet as advertised, and blow as much air as advertised. I have NOT tested these claims though. They are $8-10 each.  http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16835103062 (green LED) http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16835103063 (red LED) They also have a version with no LED (same price for all 3) but newegg appears to be out of them at the moment.
As opposed to some other kind of hockey? Please...
Um, I remember it had some parts that were quiet and some parts that were loud and I really enjoyed the almost Pixies-esque contrast between them. And I want to say the song was about Tienanmen Square, but I think I may have just projected that onto the song.
Freeblade is an ally...
You've posted a headline which points to a comment inside another self-posted thread.  That's really a bit silly, it fragments the conversation.
Wow, what a dog.
Too Soon? 
The claim "MSNBC has become the vanguard of sensationalist drivel and shoddy science reporting" is a a pretty good example of sensationalist drivel.
the real question should be, why are there so many old white men elected to anything in the states and why, when everyone else has to retire at 60-65, do pols stay on until they die
Here you go:  http://www.ustream.tv/recorded/2168114
Thanks! Now as for Saydrah, I think we're all waiting for some action... 
That part killed me to the point of no return.
 saturn@casper:~$ ssh Mordor  ssh: Could not resolve hostname Mordor: Name or service not known  saturn@casper:~$ 
Because the warming since that time is statistically insignificant.  
Yes
Yeah, but their bacon still sucks ass!
[clicky](http://imgur.com/EYto3.jpg)  That was my first attempt at this so I think I could have done better putting it together, but I liked the end result.
Wouldn't a socialist have been for single payer, or AT least a public option?
Ah, I was not aware of that.
In that order? Interesting...
I love PHP but that made me laugh big time.
If the attention to detail in manufacturing is similar to the care they put into the writing on that website, I'd expect to be bringing that thing in for repairs all the time.
 The fact that this comes as a surprise to anyone is an indicator that everyone's, even scientists' expectations of science is borderline stupid.   To make a comparison: what programmer worth his salt would think that they could successfully binary patch a windows kernel file as part of their desktop software installation process?   And yet, the expectation that a binary file can be entirely decoupled from its host system is way more plausible and realistic than the expectation that a living organism can be entirely decoupled from its progenitor.   It's baffling, really, that this is not trivially obvious.
I came.  Edit: I say this because of the nostalgia and also pretty print.
My first modem was 110 baud, I think.   300 baud seemed like such a step up.  
I overtake then slam the car into reverse taking out their headlights. Come nightfall they're screwed.
I ain't your friend, buddy!
You should hear my "succeed in the workplace by determining which Federation Captain your boss most closely resembles and emulating his/her First Officer" pitch.  (that one is complete bullshit and based on no real-life experiences.)
I'm not an expert on Faraday shields but I do know some E&amp;M.  Please forgive anything I say that isn't clear, I am trying to type this out rather quickly.  Basically, when you place any conductive material in an electric field, the electrons (or whatever mobile charged species are present) in that material will migrate so as to cancel out the electric field inside the body.  There is a simple reductive argument for why this is true covered in any E&amp;M course.  This also applies for hollow structures (Faraday Cages) and therefore anything inside the structure will not 'feel' the influence of an external electric field.  &gt;Firstly, can this shield be turned off and on, or is it an actual solid metal structure which makes it work?  If you could significantly change the resistance of the structure on-the-fly (maybe by switching semiconductor materials), you could change it shielding properties.  Note that it takes a finite amount of time (depending on the resistance and geometry of the structure) for the charges in the structure to reorient themselves to cancel the external field.  Therefore, the structure will respond differently to different frequencies of electric fields.  A perfectly conductive structure would perfectly shield at any frequency.  But cages made from materials with finite conductivity will shield more at low electric field frequencies (e.g. DC) but may not respond fast enough to cancel high frequency external fields.  The geometric structure of the cage also plays a role.  If the structure has holes in it (e.g. cage is made form a mesh), it will only shield well for alternating electric field frequencies which have wavelengths much longer than the dimensions of the holes.  Remember that light is an alternating electric field, so if your structures had holes any larger than a couple hundred nanometers (wavelengths of visible light), then some light will get through.  &gt;Secondly. If you had a faraday shield encasing an entire building, what would be the effect? Would electrical stuff still work inside it?  Yes, it would have no effect on most electrical equipment inside.  Think about most computers which are enclosed inside steel cases.  They still work.  The purpose of the steel case is to act as a Faraday cage and shield electrical noise from entering/exiting.  Assuming your building were enclosed in a perfect Faraday cage, you wouldn't be able to broadcast an EM signal from inside to outside (or vice versa).  Therefore nobody's cell phones would work.  But the landlines would be unaffected.  Well, technically you could broadcast from inside to outside if the net charge contained within the structure changed, but your cell phones are self contained units and therefore couldn't do this.   I'm sure there are a number of existing buildings which are constructed with with steel fasades which act like a Faraday cage.  &gt;Is there any way you could have the entire building encased in a faraday shield, but have a room inside it again which is not affected?  Not really, but it depends what you mean by unaffected.
It's not because the reddit app is shit, it's because the site was royally messed up for a few days. It's better now. try it again.
This is how I feel all the time.  Even when I'm asleep.
If you want your camera to fall and break into little pieces when you run over it, then yeah I'd say using modelling clay is a GREAT solution!  Seriously though, they sell helmet cams that plug into minicamcorders like the one you probably own.
Is he a mod here? THen I think people should know that, and take it into account when they see links submitted to his page.
I had the same reaction. I'm wondering if it will make sense if I read it all.
And yet he had no idea what he said that was so funny.
Terrible.  Here's a bit of what he left us:  * http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=n4Ji9o8R1Ao&amp;feature=player_embedded# * http://vimeo.com/9745535
This is fucking bullshit!
Fuck you, you mother fucking, cock sucking,  anal tongue swabbing, bitch.
This made me miss tree swings
And that's all that needs to be said.
Youthenasia, because it has addicted to chaos, which is one of their best songs. It's also for family tree, A Toute Le Monde(the original and superior version)
Hmm, well Saydrahgate is all over the front page and has managed to permeate every fucking crevice of reddit, which is maybe why you thought that it might be appropriate to drag that into here (much to the chagrin of all of us who stopped giving a shit hours ago). So yeah, I'm pretty sure they're aware of the situation, and I would hope that they're a look at it and then make a rational decision after fully educating themselves on the matter.  This would be counter to say, creating a user name made up of derogatory terms about someone who tricked you on the internet.
Looking forward to the speed boosts.
I lied. That wasn't my last post. I wanted to clear up a few misconceptions I believe you still harbor. Here are a few counter points and observations I'd like to make:  1. If I misrepresented your position, I apologize. The impression I got from you was that you were trying to prove that all religions were equally harmful. I was wrong. 2. You posted a bit of history that showed Buddhists committing violence. This is undeniable. This fact, however, does not address my original statement, in that I have not seen any Buddhist TEACHINGS that encourage violence, not that I've never heard of Buddhists in general committing violent acts. You think I'm coming off the exact same as Christian or Islamic apologists, but I think that's not entirely accurate. It doesn't take long to find passages in Christian and Islamic holy books that justify their current and past crimes against humanity. From what I've seen, your comparison is almost equivalent to saying Stalin and Mao practiced violence because they were atheists, which we both know is not true. I have yet to see passages from Buddhist texts that directly encourage the history that you posted. If you come across one, let me know. I'm willing to be proven wrong on this.  3. I am a strong believer in science, research, and the scientific method. I am a biomedical science major at a major university and I actively participate in biological research myself. I'm not trying to toot my own horn here; I'm merely expressing that I'm defending certain Buddhist teachings BECAUSE they have strong scientific evidence behind them. Knowing this, yes, I do think it's worth throwing Buddhism a bone in this respect. In fact, the face of Buddhism today, the Dalai Llama, has gone on record of saying "...if science disproves Buddhism, then Buddhism must change". This is hardly a challenge against science and reason. I have not seen scientific evidence that supports the teachings of Christianity or Islam; in fact, I've often seen the contrary. What we see coming from Buddhism is fundamentally different, because the teachings of mindfulness and meditation, which are relatively unique to Buddhism, have directly measurable benefits. And it really is a testament to those teachings that psychologists in a nation that is predominately Christian are willing to implement them in their therapy. If the benefits were very minimal and were directly similar to those of other religions, I wouldn't be promoting it, nor would I be attempting to differentiate the benefits of Buddhist teachings over other religions. If the benefits were minimal, there wouldn't be numerous peer reviewed articles on scientific databases touting how great mindfulness meditation actually is for therapy. Again, the ONLY reason I'm defending it is because science has proven it to be very effective for therapy. And we're not just talking about one or two studies here.   Here are some sources you can look into to see what I'm talking about, from a Google search. If you can access an online psychological database, I suggest doing that instead. Here are some Google results: http://www.nmr.mgh.harvard.edu/~lazar/ http://www.technologyreview.com/read_article.aspx?id=13453&amp;ch=biztech  If you're able to access actual scientific publication sites, I suggest doing a search of meditation there. I just searched the "PsycArticles" database for meditation, which resulted in many peer reviewed research articles expressing the benefits of mindfulness meditation. Here's an example abstract from one of the articles titled "Mindfulness-based cognitive therapy for individuals whose lives have been affected by cancer: A randomized controlled trial.":   "Objective: This study evaluated the effectiveness of mindfulness-based cognitive therapy (MBCT) for individuals with a diagnosis of cancer. Method: Participants (N = 115) diagnosed with cancer, across site and stage, were randomly allocated to either the treatment or the wait-list condition. Treatment was conducted at 1 site, by a single therapist, and involved participation in 8 weekly 2-hr sessions that focused on mindfulness. Participants meditated for up to 1 hr daily and attended an additional full-day session during the course. Participants were assessed before treatment and 10 weeks later; this second assessment occurred immediately after completion of the program for the treatment condition. The treatment condition was also assessed at 3 months postintervention. All postinitial assessments were completed by assessors who were blind to treatment allocation. Results: There were large and significant improvements in mindfulness (effect size [ES] = 0.55), depression (ES = 0.83), anxiety (ES = 0.59), and distress (ES = 0.53) as well as a trend for quality of life (ES = 0.30) for MBCT participants compared to those who had not received the training. The wait-list group was assessed before and after receiving the intervention and demonstrated similar change. Conclusions: These improvements represent clinically meaningful change and provide evidence for the provision of MBCT within oncology settings. (PsycINFO Database Record (c) 2009 APA, all rights reserved) (journal abstract)"  Given the strong evidence that mindfulness meditation has going for it, I don't think it's fair for you to equate it to the benefits of Christianity or Islam. If you can find something equally as beneficial behind those two religions that has a mound of scientific evidence behind it, please let me know. Until then, it seems to me that you're trying to water down and discount something that is very beneficial, just because it happened to originate from a religion. And since there is strong research behind mindfulness meditation, I find it insulting that you're assuming that I'm no better than Christian or Muslim apologists, who don't have science backing them up in this regard.   I wanted to end by asking you about what problems you think Buddhist teachings create in today's society. You're right in that I do think it's not at all a problem, because, to reiterate a point, I have yet to see any evidence to dispute this. I challenge you to show me tangible evidence that shows how Buddhist teachings have negatively affected today's society, especially in a similar fashion (of course, not the same scale) that Christianity and Islam have. I'm still confused on how you think it's any sort of threat to us. If you have evidence to prove me wrong, I implore you to give it to me. I'll gladly read it. 
Thanks for the feedback, i changed it up a bit.
There are several obstacles:  0. Most programmers are basically illiterate: they can only read code very, very slowly, and they make many errors doing so. You'd think that this would make it very difficult for them to debug their own code, and I was illiterate for a long time, and yes, it did, but it was much harder when someone else had written the code. I think this even applies to a fair number of people who teach computer science classes, even though they often get lots of practice reading students' incorrect homework results.   This is a kind of chicken-and-egg thing. You should really go read some code. It can improve your skills really, really fast.  1. Our notations change very rapidly. In 2001, I advocated that on Wikipedia, we should describe algorithms in Python instead of the non-executable pseudocode we ended up with, because there is a benefit to using a fully formal notation: you notice when there is ambiguity. If I had prevailed, all of that pseudocode would have been in danger of needing updates several times since then. When it comes to [programs from HAKMEM in PDP-10 assembly](http://www.inwap.com/pdp10/hbaker/hakmem/hacks.html#item146), nearly all of us are lost. I have a beautifully commented listing of the IBM FORTRAN-II compiler for the 7090 (a modified version of the historic first FORTRAN compiler), and I have no idea where to start.  2. Our programs are not written to be read, but to be maintained. Although it's been almost 30 years since SICP ("Programs should be written for people to read and only incidentally for machines to execute") and the launch of the Literate Programming movement, this idea has not taken over.   One of the strongest points of conflict between being maintenance and reading is the pressure that forces a useful program to grow. Nearly all software gets bigger and longer with every release: to add new features, to improve its performance, to support more platforms, and so on; and if it's useful, more and more people become available to do this work.   Sometimes this happens to books, too. I learned Perl by reading the Perl 4.036 manual page, which I think was about 40 pages. Trying to learn Perl from the online documentation today would be a joke. It's thousands of pages, and that's just counting the man pages that ship with Perl. It's happening to Wikipedia right now, too.  3. Our notations are, for the most part, not well suited to being read. They are wordy and voluminous. The [FORTRAN II compiler I mentioned](http://www.softwarepreservation.org/projects/FORTRAN/index.html#Source_code) would be about a thousand pages printed out, because it's in IBM 7090 assembly code. Perhaps if it were in APL it would be around forty pages instead, but APL didn't exist when it was written.   But however well-suited APL and Haskell may be to being *explained* and *read* — and they are; they're more like symbolic logic than they are like Pascal, and they seem most at ease with each line of code ensconced between a couple of paragraphs typeset in TeX explaining it — they don't seem particularly suited to being *maintained*.  4. We have lost a number of our great works, maybe the majority of them. Earlier today I was inquiring about Sketchpad, which was the first graphical user interface, the first constraint-oriented programming system, the first programming-by-example system, the first CAD system, the first paint program, and the first object-oriented programming system. It seems very likely that the paper tapes and plugboard notes that were Sketchpad *itself* were lost before I was born, leaving us only with some grainy videotapes and [Sutherland's masterful dissertation](http://www.cl.cam.ac.uk/techreports/UCAM-CL-TR-574.html).    The brilliant [1401 Fortran compiler](http://ed-thelen.org/1401Project/1401-IBM-Systems-Journal-FORTRAN.html) has likewise been lost, as far as I can tell. (Can you imagine, a Fortran compiler in 8kB of RAM? 8000 six-bit bytes.)   The source code to VisiCalc, to Netscape 0.91N, to Applesoft BASIC, and so on, all seem to have been lost.   (If you want to see Unix textutils, though, you should read the book "Software Tools", by Kernighan and Plauger, or possibly "Software Tools in Pascal" if you think you'll like Pascal better than Ratfor. Also, the Lions book is a good walk through the Unix kernel. Get two copies, or a two-volume version, or you'll go batty flipping back and forth.)  5. Our programs are mostly very badly written, even the best of them, which makes it tough going. This is a useful lesson in itself, of course, but it makes it difficult to spend a lot of time reading the code.   There are a lot of exceptions, and I see more all the time.
The only thing that pisses me off, I am not being paid to reddit. I keep deleting my accounts every month or so to stem the worthless karma accumulation and the BS that comes with it, only to find that I should have been somehow using it for profit. Fuck me. Not sure but I think I would have about 70k karma by now, how much would a guy need to be a profitable power user? Fuck me. 
This reminds me of the prayer said in Cool Runnings by the coach. 
2nded
Yes it would. But make sure you stay to the end and watch the bloopers. Just got done watching for a 2nd time and repeatedly laughed my ass off. I'm so happy I clicked on that link yesterday to subsapcecommunique, otherwise I never would have found this gem. TYVM /r/StarTrek.
I suck :( 9/21
Title says excellent pic but the picture is tiny and crappy.
I was in the library when it was on the front page, but now that I'm in my room it's gone.  What was the submission?
Salty!  Just like Sid jizzing down their throats!
arghhhhhh!!!!!
The circle-jerk, memetic repetition and hivemind cultures are so much worse of a problem than users complaining about the site running amazingly slow
your not helping moran
So series tied 1-1.  When do we play game 3?  Seriously, congrats to both nations and teams.  What a show of north American dominance.
I blame you for his continued living.
Well I guess that makes sense.  Carry on.
It's shinier!
NOT ANY MORE, BITCHES
Well, he's right that we have evolved with ingrained racism.  The presence of an evolved characteristic/activity/desire does not justify it morally, however. So, yes, it is wrong. It is also inevitable, for the time being.
I have a whole toolbox of languages, I choose whichever fits the job perfectly.
It's like you read my mind.
OH MY GOD I would LOVE to do this, am googling this right now!
I got to page 19 of digg.  Learned a lot.  They aren't the devil worshipping baby-eaters reddit led me to think they were.  Also they have the same links we do.  And that Oatmeal dude thanked them the same way he thanked us.  He's like the Tiger Woods of social bookmarking. edit spelling
&gt;It's called placating the masses, I mean sheep, of your party.  Obama never ever said he was going to disband the patriot act. His campaign promise was to amend it. Which he has and is doing. Like it or not.  In this case he was never placating the masses. More like the masses are retarded and never listened to him. And just invented in their head what they **wished** for him to do, instead of the reality of what he said he would do.  But sure, you Americans go ahead and argue over non-existent campaign promises that you where all "lied" too about. That makes perfect sense. That horrible evil bastard!
WTF - I hope they put them in a nice Russian jail and they get thrown around for fun.
We had a teacher in High School named Mrs. Dyke. She was unbelievably gorgeous. She didn't make it through the first semester. 
I just imagine a 13 year old sitting in a dark room, with just the glow of the computer screen, snickering quietly to yourself trying not to wake your parents as you slowly loot an entire guild hall and it's magnificent.
It's something I only recently noticed.
Is the Superbowl really that big a deal to you Americans? What sort of a condescending fucking question is this?   It was a great game between two heavy-weight teams for the Olympic gold medal. I'm sure that you know people who are obsessed with championship sporting events. 
Good analogy! I was afraid you'd call me on providing a reverse example. Here's what I was getting at.   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Piezoelectricity   &gt; The piezoelectric effect is reversible in that materials exhibiting the direct piezoelectric effect (the production of an electric potential when stress is applied) also exhibit the reverse piezoelectric effect (the production of stress and/or strain when an electric field is applied). I'm not saying a hunk of granite/basalt will be *coherent* at all, but it will experience nonuniform stress in a changing EM field. If it's got any mica, quartz, etc at all you can take it for granite.
works every time...
They are to be included in learning or teaching?
Tried not using an interpreted language? 
If rand returns a 32-bit value, then about once every 400 million shuffles of an array of 5 there will be two or more elements that get assigned the same random number, and so (assuming a stable sort) will not have their order changed. That can be fixed, but then the code gets more complicated:   sub randomize_array(@)  {   my @out;   my %h;   map {push @{$h{rand()}}, $_} @_;   map {push @out, @{$h{$_}} == 1 ? $h{$_}[0] : randomize_array(@{$h{$_}})} key   return @out;  }  Note that this version of randomize_array is using the hash "backwards" from the way the first version does. That is, instead of assigning random numbers to array elements, it is assigning array elements to random numbers.
Graal was the sickest game. 
Even if I was male (which I'm not), I'd find your opinion of women distasteful and full of stereotypical monkey poo. Besides, you Godwin'd your own response...and went on for two more paragraphs.  The sperm behind that decision is far better off 'sterile' or perhaps collecting in a pool on some dirty mattress somewhere than being used for procreation.  :)
He was a jerk when he was in office. I don't remember seeing any explanation or apology for his wife burning rock and roll records with the rest of those who see the devil everywhere Also some strange comments about the internet. While that doesn't apply to global warming, it does give you pause about where he will stand or be wishy-washy. I don't think the leopard has changed his spots.   If I want info on global warming, I'd prefer Phil Plait. (Bad Astronomy)
I live(d) in NYC and its a whole different beast. You can't drive in NYC until you're 18 either.
Colt 45 and two zig zags, baby that's all she needs.
this is sooo fucking outrageous!
*Jon
I'm amazed at how sexist this is yet getting voted up.  As a man I'm amazed a woman was able to see as I do.  Well done.
I have no idea what this show is about, but I'm going to start watching it.  For some reason, this clip reminded me of [this clip](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8YAv9uyCkaI) from Breaking Bad, where Walt finds rival meth cookers buying mats at the [hardware store](http://stansellseverything.ytmnd.com/) and tells him [you're doing it wrong](http://www.mopo.ca/uploaded_images/wrong-way-to-clean-computer-748076.jpg) and to [GTFO](http://lukey.miauu.info/picsahz/gtfo/gtfo15ht0.jpg)  PS Breaking Bad season 3 in less than a month!
If a file `~/.ocamlinit` exists in your home directory, it is preloaded in the top level. Also, `rlwrap` it for a better line editing experience.
What is a terrorist?
By the time godbois is done reading those books, he will be doing the work in his head.  Whether he commits any of that analysis to paper (or, more likely, future comments on reddit and other _fora_) is entirely up to him.
An opportunity for Conservatives, Liberals, Independents, Libertarians, Anarchists, Socialists, Communists, Fascists, Liberal Socialists, Anarcho-Capitalists, etc. to gather in frank discussion and lively debate on topics of interest to all of us. As a blogger, I will offer my opinions; But, my opinions will be valuable only to the extent that they elicit (or provoke) your comments on the subject at hand. The more we debate [and support with tangible evidence, links, references, etc.] these topics, the more we can learn about each other, and the more we will learn about ourselves. This blog will be different! A place where people are welcomed for their differences and actually enriched by them.
Why not just date those hot-to-trot 30 year-olds? They're better in bed, have a greater sex drive, and generally have fewer problems in the head.   Plus it's usually obvious that they're over 18.
God how I wish BBC in North America would carry all the good shows. Instead they carry the worst ones, home improvement and makeover shows, and if you're lucky, one good show a week.  Seriously BBC, why the fuck do you not bring the good shows to North America?  Anyway, I try to keep up on British comedies a bit, but this one I have not heard of, so if somebody would be so kind, I'd appreciate it.
It's reality in many cases, not hyperbole.  I'm 55 and making half of what I was making years ago when I lost one job after another as business kept closing.  I went from a 6-figure income to driving a truck and now work as a service clerk at a small company, working with people half my age and I dare not take a vacation or time off unless the boss is in a really good mood.  I eat my lunch at my desk, working 6:00-4:00 five days a week. I once thought that I would be living large...Now I am just trying to keep my head above water.  Any dreams of a comfy retirement are gone.  Any thoughts of helping my kids with college are gone.  I am not alone and the more people I meet, the more I see that there are many more people in my situation,  But I am more fortunate than many of my friends who have been out of work for more than a year.   Employers are driving up "Productivity" as they draw more and more work out of a smaller work force, keeping all the profits for themselves.  No one complains because no one can find another job.  Labor is at a huge disadvantage in this new economic model that was started under the days of Reagan &amp; Thatcher who saw fit to destroy unions and the rights of middle class...
No shit?  If Obama dropped his current bill and took the Republican bill, the Republican's would be against it.  They just want a new bill to rip apart.
Quick question for everyone.  How do you make soccer even gayer than it already is?  Give up?  Put it on ice.
that's IT! NONE of you can EVER play with my legos AGAIN!!  Apart from you Edmund. Tell your mom I said hi, yeah?
I could technically be convicted because one lady I was active with was 3 years and 1.5 months apart. Unlucky, I guess.
this one time i was sitting behind two chicks in a class. One said she had to go pee really bad but the teacher didn't let her go. she moaned and said to her friend: can i transfer my pee-ness to you?  i laughed so hard i had to be excused from the class...i went to the bathroom. 
Fuck you.
[This](http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/aej8z/gaming_reddit_whats_the_most_dastardly_thing/c0h6yke) isn't me, but it's the **MOST SADISTIC** thing I've ever seen.
So question: We can sit hear and moan about this person but what are people actually going to do about it? 
Then we lost our heads. Heaven forbid.
Galaxy Bounce is my favorite AMV.  He hasn't released anything in a while though....
They say that it'll take about 8 hours, but they think they'll have it ready in 4 just for you. 
I was expecting Donkey Kong :(
you blindly support your team as if it's baseball, GO 'MERIKA while it's me saying that only the morally just deserve support.  We could argue for hours on why the war happened, however it most certainly is a war of aggression - if our troops are invading somewhere then i hope they loose, if we are getting invaded i hope the invaders loose - it's that simple.   I suspect that had i said i smile when ever a terrorist is killed all the grunt morons like yourself would nod, the double standard is obvious and sorry if you don't like it but i hope your buddies and mine (because believe it or not i do actually have serving friends and yes they know how i feel) are defeated in all their invasion attempts.  Ok, i admit actually i hope they are humiliated and learn an inspiring life lesson about the immorality of war which then leads them devote their life to solving problems not causing them...... that never gets reported on the news though so i have to console myself knowing that an idiot human who though he was a hero for going and spreading american tyranny in the middle easy, usurping power and economically terrorizing an entire region is no longer living, it's like knowing that the average intelligence / decency of humanity has just risen a little -maybe evolution is still with us....
Gonewild, Random pics, showing sores....
I was watching it on a live stream that was about a minute behind real time. It sucked hardcore.   At least I could prepare myself for winning or losing based on what the cheers of the sports fanatics in the condo next door. It took a bit of the intensity away though :( Also, it would have put Canada to shame if we had lost.
Congratulations,hosers.
Quicktime can open it too.
I'd also try to find an old set of Suntour barend shifters... I personally don't like reaching all the way down to the downtube to shift and the Suntour shifters are awesome.  (Not me selling these, first Google result that came up!) http://cgi.ebay.com/Suntour-bar-end-shifter-set-made-in-Japan_W0QQitemZ320492915090QQcmdZViewItemQQimsxZ20100226?IMSfp=TL100226155017r2030
The bully's school would be concerned about her bahviour even if it was against another school's student.  The code of conduct probably applies to the bully no matter the victim.  
&gt; This was your choice. Your decision to allow yourself to be 'reeled' back in. You make it sound like women have some magical powers that render you unable to resist their siren song.  That's a bit like saying a heroin dealer has no culpability in furthering a junkie's suffering.  &gt; It was not the girl's fault that you were infatuated with her.  No, but it was wasn't very nice of her to purposely exploit that fact.  I was perfectly willing to go off and date other people, and leave her alone. I have had girls who are infatuated with me that I had no interest in.  I had the good sense to stay away until they got over it.   I most certainly could have used these people had I wanted to.  But I'd actually feel bad if I was being cruel to someone.  
That is the most fecund woman I have ever seen. She is a baby stargate.
Not much you can do with a reddit account. Perhaps an embarrassing IAmA?
heh, no but i was just in the process of opening this thread when it went down. 
[My response](http://i.imgur.com/nIQXS.gif)
the cops would always hide on the other side of the bridge there...but that street was a speed trap as well.
You're doing it wrong.
This is a fucking repost from [2 years ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/64gg1/juggling_man_spears_a_pigeon/)! Fuck you, lizarb! Reposters like you are dog shit! Delete your account...
With how many pay for porn sites there are online. I think the number of free sites is lower.
you only need to give it your info if you want to sync it. I agree, it's an awesome app, as I can make notes on the phone or in GDocs and have them in both places.
Zakaria is an idiot. I don't know why people like this get to be in the mainstream press.
I agree with this, except for the last part. It's not so much that I would be insulted that I couldn't help or that I wasn't "needed" because it seems like she can handle this on her own (and honestly, it doesn't even seem like a big issue), but the fact that she simply kept it from him. After two years, I'd expect a couple would be sharing and communicating their troubles. If my boyfriend was having a problem of any kind, I'd expect him to tell me about it - even if he didn't expect/want advice or help, at least I'd *know* about it. This is the only thing that rubs me the wrong way.
Ya lots of people still play.  The released the 1.3 patch last year. 
Seconded on this, we bought 10. No problems across the board.
Bob Costas called it the most significant moment in Canadian Sports history. I also thought it was pretty awesome when he said "The Americans want this gold. The Canadians *need* this gold."
The name of the tune is "Tutu" I believe, named after Bishop Demond Tutu. It's actually a tune more written by Marcus Miller (the bassist on the left) more than Miles. Great tune though. Awesome band and very captivating rhythm section for sure.
She might be the fucking mod that censored my input about the difficulty of working with middle-aged white women.  Fess up saydrah.
And i for one, would rather have a tooth extracted than go to a overcrowded eatery full of foodies.
hey sexy.. love this latest set.. especially that main one.. wow. ;)
*The Count of Monte Cristo* comes to mind.  
I've used and owned guns and bows since I was little. Think I got my first 22 cal at age 9? I prefer to hunt with bow and normally do, but if a bunch of my friends are going duck hunting I'll grab my shotgun. (Yes, I've shot ducks with my bows.)  I do have a couple handguns. Wife has been trained and shoots them couple times a year. She's a damn good shot too, better than me. She's not a fan of the rifles and shotguns as she's little and they kick her ass. She started shooting bow recently.
To be fair, /r/ugh only has 2 subscribers (including me, now that you mentioned the name), so he has to talk somewhere.
So where do I sign up?
Random comments could be cool, but I might try posting crazy pics of your friend all over reddit too.
she is right.  [romneycare](http://www.cnn.com/2009/POLITICS/08/20/romney.health.care/index.html)  was the GOP's idea.  &gt;Unlike Democratic proposals that would give Americans the choice of joining a government-run health care plan, Massachusetts has no public option. Instead, people in the state are required to buy private insurance, and the poor get subsidies.  we gave them everything they asked for.. just cause they are voting no on their own damn plan.. you cant say it wasnt bipartisanly created.  IT was the GOP's plan.
"The term em dash derives from its defined width of one em, which is the length, expressed in points, by which font sizes are typically specified. Thus in 9-point type, an em is 9 points wide, while the em of 24-point type is 24 points wide, and so on." - [wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dash)
Really? They add a massive amount of improvements and you get one glitch (that doesn't really affect anything important) and decide that it needs a lot of work?   Did you even report it as a bug?
Genius.
fuck syndey crosby
Learn the history. 99% of the Germans were 100% behind hitler.  Kinda the equivalent of Americans chanting "USA USA USA" when the retardo was blowing Iraq civilians to bits.
Wow!  This is really the first time I've used reddit ... thanks for all the feedback thus far!  I will respond better in a bit, just wanted to acknowledge real quick ...
McCain is old and senile. There is nothing about him that cannot be explained by those two facts.
So...the old adage is confirmed, the smarter you are, the less you get laid?
&gt;[](/fu)  -USA
2007-2008 I think.  PC. 
Thank you. It's probably more like under 1%. As someone who lived in the south for a few years, yes people love them some Bible down there. But the fundies that nibiyabi is likely referring too...even those people were skewered and seen as outcasts by my religiously conservative friends. 
&gt;I'm a douche for calling you a childish idiot for throwing a fit?  I didn't throw a fit, others did.  &gt;I'm a douche for having a fucking opinion?  Did you read my comment at all?  I never said it was because you had a differing opinion, rather that you presented it like an annoyed 12 year old.  &gt;You, sir, and sirs, are fucking pathetic.  You watch too much Olbermann.
That's a heads up play by Kidd.  When I watched the video, I wasn't sure how Woodson knew that he was coming.  He never seemed to turn his head to the right to be able to see him.  Great link.
But I don't think you'd recognise him if he was next to you on the train. Unless he was doing .. you know ...
You can always send an anonymous note to the IRS saying "So-and-So avoided his taxes."
Change?? I guess we don't need no stinkin change!!
If we're going to delve into the metaphorical sense of god then we can go ahead and assume I was speaking of the metaphorical "I", as well.  
We can use you as a scapegoat anyway if you like.
[This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YVys7jcCJDs&amp;feature=related).
I guess I just can't myself into this being offended "on behaf" of these things. I don't feel like I'm saying "On behaf of the universe/planet/human kind, stop looking us all over."  It is my personal opinion that these things are all too cool to just dismiss as something that is a stepping stone on the way to heaven. I think that about pulls it all together for me.
No. It's a tiling wm tho, so tabbing isn't really needed.
&gt; What basic principals are atheists adhereing to? Where is the "atheist bible?"  Just as fundamentalism originally described a narrow movement within Protestantism, the broadening of the term allows it now to describe pejoratively principled individuals or movements narrowly within any greater sphere.  Atheism is not without organization, but it is not an institution in any regard, and is just a category at one level while labeling many subcultures on others.  So you're right that "fundamental atheism" is an oxymoron..  still I think individuals can be *fundamentalist* in their thinking or relating, but that's an extension of the term in modern usage.  This broadening up of 'fundamentalist' has it meaning something more like "adherence to base subcultural beliefs".  In any case, your point is well taken.  I misspoke: when I said "strong contingent" I simply meant "vocal minority", and when I said *fundamentalism* I simply meant individuals who are strongly dogmatic about caricatures of real science and freethought.  And I think we should admit there are a great many people who are part of atheism subcultures and who are not much in the way of thinkers, let alone freethinkers.  These people may have the wrong ideas about a lot of things.  And then they write about it like everyone around agrees with them.  And sometimes we all do, it's just that they riddled the main content with inadequacies.  I'm not speaking against passionate people (I am one!) or about those who concentrate on celebrating casting off the veil of religion (I am one!).  I appreciate you for being outspoken, and while you've heard me argue against reviling others, you should have then also heard me praise constructive sociality.  Nobody who knows me would call me apathetic, and I'm tempted to think that's just you taking a jab.  I don't find contempt for the dogmas of organized religion surprising or objectionable in any way.  I'm not above cynicism, and I speak out daily against hypocrisy.  I'm also not worked up, so when you say 'Chill' it kind of makes me chuckle a little..  you've got the wrong idea about me, and to be fair it's because I represent myself poorly sometimes.  Thanks for taking the time to provide more of the picture.  Now that I think about it (and have been brought to task) I just got tired of people writing incorrect things about evolution and other science in ostentatiousness.  People who misrepresent.  I'd hate to be a hypocrite and have done the same...  but perhaps I just did   -_-
When Greece had to refinance some of its debt in January, it asked for 3 billions euros. It got 8 billions and it could have gotten easily 15 billions. Sure, investors charge a hefty risk bonus but Greece shows absolutely no signs of defaulting. In the meantime, Goldman Sachs still spread rumors that Greece was having a hard time refinancing, with vested interests to do so...
Not having ever seen a review or expected more than what I got, I was totally satisfied and happy with it.   I can imagine though, a different reaction had I been following their plans and forums. Sucks.  [Off to look for the DLC...]  Edit: No DLC for the PC!? OK, I'm leaning towards your point of view...
So essentially the system is corrupt and broken.  You know what? I can almost guarantee that this won't go anywhere, Saydrah will remain a mod and we'll all be here a month from now, because if there's one thing we hate worse than obscene abuse of power, it's **not having access to reddit!!! ;_ ;**  Seriously. We should vote with our feet, but we're not going to, they know this, which is why they won't do anything.
kikikiki!
+1 For name
Read the [reddiquette](http://www.reddit.com/help/reddiquette).  You should not be downvoting comments that add to the discussion, regardless of your opinion of the content, especially if the comment is well written and not a personal attack on anyone.
I jumped in Deland, FL. It's about 10 miles from Cape Canaveral. The instructor said that they would jump during night missions. fucking awesome, i'll be jumping again in about a week.
The JVM is implemented in C/C++.
What do you expect strippers to do with their kids when they have to go to work?
You know what is really fucking amazing?  The restraint of those policemen. They just move away from the flames.   If that were North America those guys would be riddled with 100 bullet holes in the first 10 seconds.
Lets not spoil my statement with facts eh?
Yeah, but can he pull a Three-peat?
If you haven't seen *De battre mon coeur s'est arrêté* or *Sur mes lèvres*, they are both masterpieces. But this is rumored to be even better! I cannot wait.
A friend of mine had a tree pruning business. When a live branch fell on a power line, he *thought* he could grab it.
I'd rather go to mars then give Israel bombs. 
I want the government involved in my life in every way....I even volunteered my own personal info to them just to show that I support them.   
I always forget the order. :)  In this case, it actually makes more sense to do it the way i did, otherwise people accidentally get to NSFW without meaning to.
4 years to get to 200, and that may well be just right, but in another year they could be in fantastic shape. I don't know about you, but 5 years of work isn't a lifetime, and in the long run they'll better off for all those other years that follow and they'll be better suited to maintain it.
I started programming with C++ and didn't dare look at PHP for a matter of years. Frankly I found it brilliant. I wouldn't say PHP is just for newbies, although I can see why people might think that way.
Upvote for grammar and formatting.
I think the point is that in this day and age, trying to sell data in a scarcity model is ludicrous.   It's like rtying to sell people drinking water by the bucketful, now everyone's got the stuff on tap. Yes, it undercuts the livelihoods of the water-sellers. And yes, you can keep it illegal, and yes, you can install microphones on every street listening for the sound of running water that isn't a shower, bath or toilet, and send the marines in to raid the place each time.   But you know, it's a losing battle. People are *going* to drink the stuff - and the only way you could stop them is either to ban plumbing altogether, along with any drinking vessel that isn't chained to the water-seller's cart, and basically to hold the population at gunpoint - privations far wider in scope and greater in severity than is faced by the water-sellers in the first place.   Artists and creators of content: technological change has undermined your business model. The way you've done things up until now is dead, sorry. You just can't continue making money out of selling individual copies of your work. It was good while it lasted, but that game is over now. Shed a single tear, and wave goodbye.   However, that doesn't mean you can't make money out of content. After all, you'll notice that you can still walk into a shop and buy water. Plain old ordinary water, like you get out of the tap. At $2 a pint, even.   How the hell do they do that? How can you do the same thing?   Think about it. What does bottled water provide that access to tapwater doesn't?   It's cold, it's conveniently packaged, it's at the place where people are buying their lunch, people can take it and go sit wherever, they don't have to worry about spilling it, they don't have to carry a bottle or cup around with them before or after, and they don't have to stand there drinking from a bubbler.   You don't sell them the *product*. You sell them the *service*. You sell them the ability to have what they want, where they want it, when they want it, and how they want it, without the hassle of having to do it all themselves.  And witness: the bottled water industry is *fucking huge*. Closer to home, open-source software development is *huge*, and companies make plenty of money - and pay lots of developers - selling *the service of providing their free product* in a way that suits their customers' needs.   So there's no reason service-based business models can't exist for other forms of content. The profit margin might be a little leaner, but fuck, I thought you said you were starving *now* - and this one can't be undercut.   Hell, this is why I very happily buy games on Steam. It isn't about the content. I could pirate the damn content. I pay for the fact that I don't have to worry about media getting lost or damaged, I don't have to worry about broken or infected copies off some random torrent, I don't have to make backups, I don't have to ferret out and install patches or updates, I don't have to worry about retailers being out of stock, closed or too far away. I just see something cool pop up on the store page, I click, watch trailers, read reviews - and if I like what I see, a couple more clicks and it's mine forever, securely and easily. And of course, valve games in particular have the huge server network backing them, so I know there's a list of secure, available and patched servers to play on, without needing to worry that a game will be unsupported in my area, or piss about typing in IP addresses off some obscure web page.   THAT is what I pay for. The convenience and "just works" factor. I won't buy physical-media games any more, and honestly I can't be bothered with the hassle of torrenting them and all its attendant woes.  What I'd pay far more for would be on-demand general media service. Just stream me any movie, any song, any game, any app, as and when I ask for it. So I record the stream. *Doesn't matter*, because the value comes from the convenience of having whatever, whenever - not the product itself.   Even better would be a flat-rate model. Pay royalties to content producers in the form of a per-second share of my subscription fee while I access their content. They get paid, I'm happy paying,   Re-tool the recording industry. Kill the album, and even the single, dead. Hype up live performances, and give away recordings (either physical or mp3) as valueless marketing souvenirs.   Kill the iTunes store in the same way. Make the *entire store* the library, and charge a flat monthly fee for access. Sure, they can download stuff, and keep their sad little static library on their computer - without all the value-add of constant updates, live streams, collaborative filtering, et cetera.   The concept of DRM should die the death that guild secrets underwent centuries ago. It's outdated, unworkable, impossible to enforce without ludicrously draconian measures - and can be completely replaced by an open system with none of its inherent vulnerabilities. 
I'll see that raise, and raise you Randy Johnson and a baseball. [Randy Johnson](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AiZZObWPi5Y)
How about legitimate according to you?  How do you settle in your own mind that one allegorical interpretation is more likely to be correct than another one?  Is there any such thing as a correct allegorical interpretation?  EDIT:  Let me clarify a little where I'm coming from.  In my understanding, the "literal" meaning is what we think the original writer intended, as best as we can reconstruct from what we know about his culture and the text itself (i.e. grammar, genre, etc).  I acknowledge that interpreting the bible in that way might not yield the whole intended meaning.  After all, the NT understanding of the Old often probably couldn't have been arrived at by someone adhering strictly to literal interpretive principles.  But acknowledging that there might be deeper, hidden meanings in the text doesn't get us much closer to figuring out what those hidden meanings are.  So, I guess what I'm really asking is, how do you figure out whether an allegorical interpretation was intended by the original author?  Or is that not even a consideration?
Yeah, disregarding the laws of physics can lead to a whole lot of amusing conclusions.  If you shoot in the air, the bullet will fall back down at terminal velocity, i.e. much slower than it exited the gun in the first place.
in some ways the middle east is way much more advanced than us. they have been dealing with this issue for thousands of years.
Win!
According to Nine Inch Nails you are looking for me.  I can't attest to meeting all of the criteria you listed, but I trust Trent Reznor's judgement.
No, homosexuality is lust.
Thanks for the quick reply. Can you elaborate on how the code words? Specifically, I'm interested in how the inciteful comment trophy is awarded. 
Does anyone know the auto-kick formula? Who it decides to kick?
Totally right?  [Hey Reddit, My girlfriend dress up our kitten to look like an angry narwhal watching Glen Beck hate bacon](http://blogs.adelaidecitycouncil.com/photos/uncategorized/2008/09/22/no.jpg)
You know, I honestly can't even remember the last time my internet connection has been dropped, and I only ever play games on my desktop computer sooooooo... really, this isn't that big of a deal. I'll brace for downvotes though, because everyone on this website has a shitty internet connection that breaks every five seconds.
It's for their parents to sign obviously!
&gt;Of course, we would still need to deal with the national security risks of our growing dependence on a global oil market dominated by dwindling reserves in the most unstable region of the world  Maybe we could actually drill in the US?
Yeah, and 1/10th the people...scale can be a bitch sometimes
I think we "been there, done that" too.
If a judge is on the board of directors of a firm who is a party to a case he is presiding over, it is a conflict of interest. Period. It is not necessary to explore whether the judge was impartial in his ruling or whether his position impacted his decision.
Enough of them not to pay taxes and steal from the state... yes.
Glad they are showing some faith in the guy!
I would beg to differ, a beautiful algorithm should transcend the language that it is written in and inspire awe in programmers of all disciplines, for example a merge sort, and many recursive algorithms show the same beauty.. I guess that these are algorythm's and not a program's that display beauty though...I have a funny feeling that 200 years from now we will still have very similar "basics" to what we have now. 
A much larger percentage of Americans have dealings with Australians than North Koreans with Americans.  And a large percentage of those Australians are in Sydney, the country's center for technology and international commerce.
this is OLD - what makes you think he made the rage comic?
uhm  http://southernmaryland.backpage.com/FemaleEscorts/better-than-the-rest-i-have-what-you-want-21/3039378  is the first result for me
My favorite thing to do on GTA 4 is to face my car towards a ledge with people walking by, then as they walk in front of my car I slowly and gently drive ahead and push them off the ledge to fall to their death.  I found this hilarious.   Either that or driving a car up to the hospital entrance so no one can escape.  Then killing everyone inside one by one. 
Sometimes having some crazy gear on will ensure that you get seen by motorists.  Love them or hate them, you will notice a flashy cyclist, and you might be pissed at them but you're not going to accidently hit them because you didn't notice them. I was a bike messenger for 3 years in DC.  There is a courier there named Gadget who is straight out of Mad Max.  For a while he was riding some badass lightweight &gt;$3000 mountain bike that was loaded down with all kinds of chrome and parts of other automobiles that he had found and strapped onto his bike - the thing looked heavy metal as fuck.   Gadget raced with NCVC and was _very_ fast and he had a wild stroke when he was sprinting - elbows and knees all over the place.  He wore body armor like a motorcyclist:  shoulder and hip pads, roost protectors, full face helmets, crazy ass SIDI boots.  I'd say his get-up was 66.6% looks and 33.3% safety, but don't underestimate the safety benefits of a bizarre appearance.   
We need videos of this stuff.  Instant youtube classic.
Close this thread. "Conspiracy" closed. 
I think I would go balistic if I had to live like that. It would be too terrifying. But simultaniously awesome.  I can't imagine either of those scenarios (the deaf or blind ones) at all. I just can't wrap my head around it.
&gt; and program in a special 10 second delay for rendering every page. Just sayin.  Because that's not childish or anything.
you not happy when a bad man is defeated? 
&gt; but they rarely throw drinks at women  sometimes they throw frozen bottles of water at pedestrians.
37Jesus replied: " 'Love the Lord your God with all your heart and with all your soul and with all your mind.'[a] 38This is the first and greatest commandment. 39And the second is like it: 'Love your neighbor as yourself.'[b] 40All the Law and the Prophets hang on these two commandments."  Mathew 22: 37-40  Sounds to me like Jesus was all about love.
Probably not, and then Nash would proceed to lose.
Smart and brave kid. I wish I was so together when I was that age.
Personally, I have a theory that the Great Depression caused the higher savings rate of the 70s.  The people that grew up and learned from the 30s and from their parents had better savings habits and better fiscal responsibility during the 70s.  Since then, the 90s and 00s had worse fiscal responsibility because they were spoiled and didn't learn the lessons that the generation before them had.  Unfortunately, it is a hard skill to learn to save your money, hence why we are having debt problems now.  Also note how different  and making money are to saving money.  These are all different schemas to maintain and each has their own problems.  EDIT: wording change
It is the best! 
I'm not digging it. Too weird.
Waiting for the porn to load.
My mother had me when she was 36 and my brother when she was 38, and we both turned out (medically) fine. 
it's a clam (no pun intended)
&gt;Still make sure even if you give them the files you contract states that YOU OWN THE WORK and not them.  No one is going to hire you to make their logo if you retain rights to the logo.  Also it becomes their trademark, I don't think you can retain rights.  It's simple, they hire you and they own the finished work and you have no rights to reuse parts of that work for other clients.  Set your prices accordingly.
The only difference I think is that the US has no second to them when it comes to total wins in Olympic Basketball.  Canada has Russia and they just tied with them for the most gold medals by winning this game.  Granted Russia wasn't all that this time around but still that's just THIS winter olympics.  My two cents anyway.
I think this is an oversimplification of the issue. It seems to me that an aggregation of persons can exert a moderating influence on extreme acts or persons. When person A tries to act in a way that causes person B more harm than it does good for A, dispassionate, neutral parties can intervene through the mechanism of the state. When there is no established mechanism, this intervention relies on altruism of the dispassionate, neutral parties, of which I am skeptical.
That is why I wrote this. I took what seemed like the easy way out. 
Skateboarding *IN* rollerblades?  Mother of God, you'll tear a hole in the space/time continuum.
They chose...  Rapture. 
&gt; mitochondrial DNA  Sorry guys, but you won't be able to eat that prehistoric steak yet.
Ubuntu 10.04 supports iPhone and iPod Touch **synching** out-of-the-box  ftfy
Full disclosure - I gave up on python/Apache integration after failing to make mod_python work. YMMV.
I don't agree. Just because you make your living on the internet, you shouldn't be immediately disqualified form any form of modship.  Thats like automatically disqualifying the most qualified redditor from being a mod. I say this because someone who works on the internet is mostly likely to be online and available to moderate a given subreddit.   Furthermore working on the internet doesn't ban you from creating a subreddit. If you create a subreddit and work on ths internet, OH NOEZ you can't moderate it!  There is nothing to stop someone from creating a new subreddit and driving traffic to the subreddit (see r/marijuana and now r/trees)  What about this subreddit, should Saydrah not moderate this subreddit, which is self post only because she works on the net? No Thats just fucking stupid. 
Congratulations Canada - as a passionate hockey fan, regular visitor to the dentist, and yearly filer of tax returns, I too know the keen exhilaration of meeting expectations.
Couldn't stand the voice. Taking OP's word for it.
On a side note, Gore's much hyped warnings about hurricane strength and frequency are strongly disputed in a [new study](http://www.timesonline.co.uk/tol/news/environment/article7044158.ece) by the US's National Hurricane Center.
Came to say this, good to see you have it under control.
Wait, Crosby *isn't* Jesus?
RCT3 did away with death, unfortunately. This makes the game far less interesting whenever an "accident" occurs.
There was no "downfall," only you being a bully and using Reddit as your personal army because you're too dense to understand what I wrote. I hope you feel like a big strong man for directing people to write hateful and threatening things to me over the Internet. The only result is that I now think that a majority of LGBT Redditors are fucking douchebags like you, a few exceptions aside.
I'd be interested to hear her arguement as non-guilty.
It is perfectly legitimate for a dog to live opposite you. This creates a greater need for good behaviour on the part of the dog.
I'm a recovering alcoholic.  I've got stories that could turn your blood to a handle's worth of Tequila  ;-)
&gt;bigger, stronger, and dare i say, smarter  You are not a daft punk song.  ....wait .....Kanye?
Willingly?  If not, you should at least try it once. 
why not... -HUG-   Have a good day btw...= HAGD use it
It works everytime.
You should put up an ad on craigslist asking for someones refrigerator box
&gt;Then there is the cliche: Why is this surprising? He campaigned on it.  People like myself say this, because when there is a statement such as: &gt;(which he used to oppose)   In the main heading. And then x amount of idiots posting that they where lied too, and Obama was lying. He never promised to get rid of it in the first place. People can be outraged all they want, just don't pretend he's doing something he said he'd never do. That's the definition of propaganda.
Yes.  And my Fallout 3 DLC is gone (3/5th of it is anyway).  Weird.  I don't know if the two are linked or not... I usually play with my internet connection turned off, but even so, Fallout 3 is telling me the DLC isn't there.
Nothing wrong with open tunings.I stay there all the time.Open D or E with a capo and open G or A with a capo.  http://www.youtube.com/user/johnnyhoodoo#p/a/u/0/RMQgbmZ4hrg open D or thereabouts.
Why is what so?
Clearly faked. The bird was flying forward but somehow dropped straight down. If it was real the bird and skewer would have landed a few meters forward of where it was hit. Conservation of momentum people, not a hard concept.
What city?  Ever get tricked into serving a process? Edit:  I am going to hijack the shit out of this thread if OP doesn't get on here and start talking about gear ratios or weed or something remotely bike messenger related.
heh... when I clicked this, I got the "Reddit is Down" message  and I was like "Reddit = Canada?"
damn! If you are going to kill yourself, I think you have an obligation to not take out innocents in the process.  Poor girl.
I agree with your suggested methods for reducing abortions. That said, I think a lot are illogical, but there are also many who are simply idealists, and don't want to compromise. I think that's pretty silly, but I can at least understand the position of "not a utilitarian" even if I think those are all great methods. Edit: I think SirTin said it better; I agree with him.
Hypocrite. 
The issues of Piracy and DRM are not really seperate, but two symptoms of of the same problem - the consumers and producers in this market have vastly different expectations of what they want the norm to be.  There is an over-saturation of content, gamers want to play many more games than they can afford to buy. As a result, they will buy the titles that they perceive to be of the greatest value, and pirate games they wish to experience, but are not prepared to invest in.  Producers want to extract every dollar they can from both retail customers and people who buy games second hand. In theory, if a game can not be pirated, it will need to be purchased, but often the means of protecting from piracy is a hindrance to the paying customer, so it instead has a detrimental effect on sales.  Both of these perspectives are failing to see a realistic median where the market can carry on with a healthy degree of profitability, innovation, and consumer satisfaction.  The most realistic solution is one that is not dissimilar to the old free-ware model, but is a little more complex for the age we live in.  By releasing a game demo for free, you attract users to your product with no investment on their behalf, you create a community, and you give users an indication of whether your product is worth investing in further. Demos are good, but it's their separation from the retail product that holds the product back.   Imagine a model in which the basic function of the game is released at no charge. Users can play and participate with the entire community, and get a worthwhile experience, but further content can be added to your game experience through purchases - either through purchasing cosmetic or functional items individually, or entire 'packs' of content, or a single payment to unlock the entire functionality of the game.  Customers who would have bought the full retail version can still do so, and have uninhibited access to all of the content of the game. Users who would have pirated the game can join for free, with of course drastically less content than a paid customer, but have the incentive to make small purchases to improve their experience. In this model, the player base that would have been pirates, are now potential customers, and are valuable additions to the game's community. Obviously this model works best with games of a competitive online nature, but could be made to work for most genres of games.  A great example of a game that could have used this model is Borderlands. Imagine if the base game was released for free, but was considerable shorter. This creates a larger community than a retail game could create because it's within all gamer's price range. From this start point, the developer could release extra weapons, items, character skins, animations, all purchasable at a reasonable cost individually. This draws some income from the kind of gamer that would never have spent any money on the product. Further, the expansion packs to the game would be available for purchase - to a very large potential player base.  If there's no need to pirate a game, it won't be pirated. If it can be played for free legally, you're turning pirates into potential customers.
No, and sucks to be you apparently. Looks like she puts out. Heh.
You started going on about Chef Boyardee.  Relax, you sound like you need a spliff.
This thread can't be serious.  Old shit makes it to the front page, this one just happened to be from her.  This is a red herring if I ever saw one. Dear Christ, people.
It was interesting hearing your opinions, thanks for commenting.
I fapped to this porn
pretend every subreddit is /r/shittyadvice
That's quite obviously a mouse. :P
Happens to men in the gay community, too.  I had a developing relationship with a bi-guy, whose mates socially excluded him when they found out.  For all their pushing for social acceptance, the gay and lesbian community needs to do their own work on accepting the fluid nature of human sexuality. My advice: tell her that you are attracted to who she is right now, and that labels don't matter to you.  Be supportive if she does complain about being ostracized and help her through it by pointing out to these friends this is not about sexuality 'football teams' but allowing adults to love other adults in the manner that they choose appropriate, irrespective of gender.
This was on reddit [2 days ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/videos/comments/b6yih/thrown_stick_on_power_lines/)  And [1 day ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/b7cyt/caught_on_tape_tree_branch_somehow_lands_on_power/)
i don't understand
Canada's only won Olympic gold **twice** since 1952, so it's a pretty big deal. Also, they barely beat the Slovaks and Swiss, and lost to the USA in the round-robin.  
Yes, considering the global audience.
Tell us more about your time with ArtisticDomme.
Critics I don't mind.....Republicans are more dangerous to America than Terrorists.
Me too. 
What is cheese? 
Was making $100k a year at 21 but was dating club girls and cheaping on lawyers?
could you put that in japanese so we could better understand it?
Excellent, thanks. 
Well at least they won't end up gay at that rate 
Ladies and gentlemen, the network of Olbermann has out-Olbermanned Olbermann.
Stop being pedantic; it doesn't make you look any more smart.  Reddit's **ENTIRE** revenue model is based on users **actually using** the site.  Telling people to fuck right off if they don't like the horrible performance is directly *against* that model.
What is that Olympic Hockey you speak of? I dunno about you, but I just watched an All Star Game.
If you can find a place that will make those professional-quality albums and sell them direct to you the customer, AND you have the graphic design skills to lay out an album...I say go for it. My experience has been that it's really hard for the average person to lay out an album and make it look good. I'm not aware of pro-quality sites that will sell direct, but then again I haven't looked that hard.
So bodybuilding and high speed sprinting is out of the question?   What's your diet look like? How much does this shit cost?
When I had my paraguard, I used to use the Instead cup all the time, even though it was contraindicated. I believe it has to do with the strings...if the strings get lodged up against the cup, you can tug on the IUD when you remove the cup. I never had a problem, though.   I ended up getting a tubal after my 10 years were up. I currently use a diva cup, but I like the Insteads better. Too bad they are disposable...
Tits McBoobsface
Assuming you're actually curious:  "Pegging the disks" means that the computers are actually reading from and/or writing to the hard drives.  This doesn't sound bad, but hard drives are far, far slower than RAM, and on a site this big the difference matters.  When most of the data the site is using is coming from RAM on its servers it can respond very quickly, but when it needs to talk to the hard drives things get slower.  "Thrashing" is a term that basically means the servers are talking to the disks *all* the time, and are asking for data faster than the disks can deliver it.  Imagine the conversation going on inside a server like this:  **CPU:** Hey, I need post 1023475 to show to this user.  RAM, do you have it?  **RAM:** Nope, don't have it.  **CPU:** Okay, Hard Drive, do you have it?  **Hard Drive:** Yep, it's somewhere on me.  Let me go get it.  ... meanwhile, another user requests another page ...  **CPU:** Hey, I need post 1999500 to show to this user.  RAM, do you have it?  **RAM:** Nope, don't have that one either.  **CPU:** Darn.  Hard Drive, can you get me this one too?  **Hard Drive:** Dude, I'm still working on getting that last one you asked for.  I'll get you this new one after I find the first one!  When you're getting hundreds/thousands of requests per second the list of things for Mr. Hard Drive to find can get very long, and so the time it takes to deliver a page to you gets longer.  *This is a gross oversimplification but it might give you a rough idea of what the OP meant.*
looks like there is a new northern front on our global war on terror. sorry canada. you are the red menace.
I promise to never again hack into your machine and permanently activate your caps-lock.  That's a terribly malicious thing to do.
[serious business](http://www.twoism.org/forum/images/avatars/6030155104a986fec4c279.gif)
This seems largely to deal with the issue of intra-group cooperation. He admits within the article that there was competition between groups. How are conflicting interests of separate groups to be settled outside of some existing framework?
It's been blipping ever since you saw your dad coming out the shower.
&gt;And the are constantly swearing.  FTFY
Broccoli stalks are yummy. 
great links. thanks!
I was going to have a sandwich for lunch, but I was interrupted by Batman.
Let me guess... You are a senior and you just read this in class. Am I right?
I'll take the bitch on the left
But, they're regulated by how many minutes of commercials they can show in a given time period.  They agree to that to get their FCC license to continue broadcasting.  I think it's something like 8 minutes per half hour (which is already recockulous).  NBC has shown, in my estimation, close to 25 minutes of commercials in the last hour.
Yeah, Madison reacting like that when finding out about Scott and her mysterious knowledge of Jayden's phone number (and who he was at all) really annoyed me. Not to mention the fact that it is a complete mystery how the hell she knew who Ann Shepard was.  Don't get me wrong, I loved the game, but it would have been so much better if the writer hadn't insisted on there being such a huge twist with the identity of the killer. I would have greatly preferred something more like the movie Seven, where the killer wasn't someone we were already familiar with, but there was also an interesting twist at the end with his actions. (purposefully left that vague in case someone hasn't seen it.)
sorry no that was just a last minute toss in.  the korean girl was also living in my building and...i have reasons for never forgetting her. :D
Nine Inch Nails. Trent Reznor is master of subtlety and mixing in references to previous songs.
This is how it really is for many people. Just because every job doesn't offer reasonable compensation and doesn't respect their employees doesn't mean that many don't.  Disconnected from practical concerns of everyday life? I'm not begging for money on the street or fighting for clean water, but I think I know how life actually is. 
What top slot? The PSU goes at the bottom.
FUCK YOU! ::sigh:: No... you guys played the better game. (fuck) ... CONGRATULATIONS. I vacation every summer in Quebec and I thought I'd take this in stride, but...DAMN.
I murdered tons of newbies in a protected territory (Keldrin Town) in an online RPG mod for an old FPS called Tribes.   I globally announced to the entire server that I was giving away items and coins to new players at the bank, when in reality I had lured a level 3000+ Centurion into the bank from across the map.   I then continued to throw all the enthusiastic newbs my heaviest fucking items so they couldn't run away from the impending doom. Shit hit the fan, and people were dieing left and right, spawning, and returning to try and retrieve their belongings only to be slaughtered again and again in a single blow.  Eventually the Centurion began to pick up everyone's items and the mid-level RPGers began responding to the newb's cursing and death cry's. They came to town to see what the fuss was about, but I'd disappeared and then reappeared by the town border after I had mimiced (spell to transform) a goblin. From there I continued the chaos by bombarding the town with spell after spell. Anyone leaving the town and running for cover received a solid thwack from my warmaul as I stood by the gates..  I'm pretty sure I lost a few levels from all the negative experience points I received from the onslaught of all that new blood. lol.. and was temporarily banned.
One problem:  The link posted was not an interpretation at all...  it was the actual scripture... I agree that there are other passages that say women should be included in the learning of scriptures...  what I would like to know is what is *your* interpretation of this passage ?   
Like the bible belt?
Some girls *really* are girls-only.  Sounds like this one isn't.  I suggest treating it like any other relationship.  There are a couple extra potential pitfalls (e.g., she finds she misses something about how she feels in a relationship with a girl, and she just cannot get that from *any* boy) but het-het boy-girl relationships are full of similar complications.
It's a line in a commercial from the 80s - for life insurance for old people, I think - where the announcer who had an Ed McMahon-type voice (or might have actually been him, I barely remember) said that the offer was available in 49 states, and then cheerfully said *sorry Tennessee!*
"Authentic participation" is business speak for pretending to be a good member in a community well enough to be able to monetize it. Like if you had someone that pretended to be your friend so they could sell you things on the sly and make money off of you.   It is fundamentally dishonest (even more so than business marketing itself, which is saying something) and brings everything that person has done into question because now you have to ask yourself what are the motivations *behind* this persons actions and reevaluate all your past interactions with him/her.   In this case, Saydrah's comments and actions aren't motivated by a desire to interact, promote, and enjoy a community, they're based on making money off of us by wearing the costume of "good" member and feeding us what she's paid to spread around. 
No way.   The entire show was based on a single-segment gag stolen from Japanese TV?  No wonder it was canceled.
You know as well as anyone else that account age does not equate to Reddit usage. Stop blocking the point. There IS a conflict of interest and I find it skeevy. She can stay as a user and post, but as a mod it is not appropiate. 
...and I was just about to get my life together.
&gt;&gt; What do you think accounts for his lack of articles?  Perhaps is has something to do with his bizarre inability/unwillingness to show his original birth certificate?  /tongue-in-cheek
That means.... shit... Obama is Agent Smith.
I don't think it will work hat way...
You guys sound like a riot! 
kind of funny to see reality setting in on all the obama lovers that were blinded by his rhetoric.  you know, he did vote for telecom immunity before the election; that might have been a clue.  that being said, i also expected a lot more from him.  what's kind of funny is seeing people try to defend him whereas had it been bush these same people would probably have been going nuts about it.  
Sure, just not for the reason you're expecting...
ANYTHING STEVE ALBINI HAS PRODUCED
Yeah cant get anything.  Even Netflix wont work. 
Hey, whip that thing out and fuck her till she's rather have a dick in her than another chicks tongue. For the male race, turn the bitch to the right side of the force!
Because jesus was well known for his MMA skills?
'Militant' would be voting against people's rights and diminishing the importance of legal recognition of those rights; pointing out where someone is wrong is not 'militant'. Sorry, but this word gets misapplied way too often.
You're blind to the tone of your posts. You come off as pompous, arrogant, and aggressive. This is more important than the actual content of your posts.   Also, if you want to see criticism of Dawkins, there were many posts on /r/atheism about the situation. There was one in particular that expressed the disappointment that Dawkin's community felt with him. Sure, there are some people that defend him blindly, but don't assume that everyone here and those who frequent Dawkin's forum treat him like some sort of messiah. 
You are definitely beautiful.
I've noticed that any video that zooms in and out real quick like that, is fake.
awwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwwww...
He actually never pretended anything. He always said he'd amend the patriot act. Next time research. This post isn't just for you, it's for everyone who believes he was "lying". Obama getting rid of the patriot act is a myth in peoples heads that never ever came from Obama. So if they voted for him thinking that, that's their ignorance. They where never mislead - in this case.  /facepalm 
Hitch. Love everything about that movie.
Thank you.
bvhvftdrs fufutdds kjjhgv  I did it. How much do i get paid now?
Yah, I wasn't expecting that... I wonder what they did?
you lose
Au contraire, good sir!  The history of ideas are the ideas themselves.  This is foundational to the Hegelian dialectic which underlies the modern university system.  Consider this: You wake up at 5 am, leave your campsite, and hike to the summit of Mount Washington.  I drive my car to the top.  Can it be said that our experiences at the summit are the same?  Do we have the same views?  Will we appreciate the landscape in the same way?  I argue we cannot.  In my opinion, your time at the summit is surely superior to mine because of our different paths to the summit.  Do you think the world is divided into "science" and "bullshit creating"?  Why don't you enjoy the majority of fine art?  Are there no well-made films, stirring works of music, sublime paintings or subtle works of literature you can enjoy?  What great power is held by social science?  Can you cite some examples for me?  I'm not sure I understand.
...or states where gay marriage is, *gasp*, legal.  You want to have it both ways: States can pass only the laws that you like and none that you don't.  At some point you're just going to have accept that democracy means people choosing what laws they want -- and you'll have to have faith in your fellow citizens that they'll make, for example, slavery and beating one's wife illegal.
What did you dread? Dogs? People who don't like being disturbed waving shotguns around? Crazy people?  I could use this information.  Edit: Also, how did you start your dialogue/conversation when the door first opened. And were there any tricks for engaging/keeping people who seemed initially very reluctant to talk?
How I wish I could vote for you 1000 times over.
Bah, I'd taser people until they were whimpering in the fetal position, and then i'd pour gas on 'em and light 'em.
Well, I guess I've just had very different experiences.  I have found gun stores that don't actively push politics, but they seem few and far between. And I'll agree that stores that push their own idea of what types of guns you should own are annoying as hell.  "Black guns" have their place, but not when I'm trying to buy a single-shot rolling block .22 rifle.
Thank you silly_putty. And congratulations on an awesome win. It could not have been more exciting. I nearly hit the ceiling (literally) when the US tied the game with 30 seconds to go. My mom of 86 years wondered what all the excitment was about and came to watch the overtime. She's not much of a sports fan, but she was today. Cheers to your good sportsmanship and for a great Olympics.
I'm a computer science major and I often hate how my accomplishments are often seen as trivial by the layman.  I can spend weeks coding a really awesome program but unless it is some high end computer game with 3D animations and lots of "ooh shiny!" type things, then the average person doesn't think I worked that hard.  It's kind of like working on an OS kernel.  It could be a million+ lines of code but if all the end user sees is a command line with a few basic scripts, they won't be that impressed.  I'm sometimes jealous of people who have a talent which can be demonstrated very easily on stage, like juggling or playing music.  You can't really have computer programming in a talent show.
He is referring to something legitimate.  It was one small reference, but it follows several recent criticisms.
Microsoft should sue itself
you're god damn right I care about this hockey game.   and now that it's over I am super stoked. canada wins the most gold in the history of the winter olympics on home soil and sid the kid fulfills his inevitable national hero status. way to fucking go canada!  it was an excellent game, USA gave canada a run for their money!
Correct me if I'm wrong here but... is reddit not a business?   Granted this mod being in "social media" is aside from the reddit business model, but my point is that this site isn't even here to not make money in the first place, so what the hell is the difference?
not sure I understand your point, OP. pleading "not guilty" is a right in our justice system (thank god). she has no responsibility to plead guilty and if she's selfish enough to speed around a school bus I'm sure she's going to watch out for her interests in court.
apology accepted :)
OBAMA SUCKS..........................................................
More (much more) information is needed...   * What do you mean "string"? char[]? std::string? Any of the other 1300 types of strings out there?   * If it is a complex string class, like std::string, you shouldn't be storing the external character pointer as they may become invalid or not point at what you think they should. Use iterators or whatever the string class uses to refer to character indices.  * What do you mean empty? 0x00? 0x20?   * How do you know they're empty? Are you logging the characters, manually checking the pointer address? Trusting the debugger?   * The source code, or the relevant portion of it, would be helpful.
Give that guy a haircut and put him in hipster clothes, and he looks like any 'ol douchebag walking around in New York.
seems like the punishment would fit the crime to me.
This comment is a perfect illustration of the techno-nerd equivalent of the martial arts axiom "there is always a more powerful opponent". The only thing I understood in that sentence was "MD5".   Carry on sir.
I don't ... what?
Thread slowly degrades to males bitching about how much females talk. Last I remembered, guys just tuned out what girls said by watching T.V.
How old are you?
It sounded like a standard Fark weekend post to me...
This reminds me of a story from scouts. On a camping trip a fellow scout stepped on a hot dog skewer and it went clean through his foot. Also, being able to see through a hole in someones foot is very unsettling and disgusting.
&gt;  In fact, the crisis is still growing because we are continuing to dump 90 million tons of global-warming pollution every 24 hours into the atmosphere — as if it were an open sewer.  Describing CO2 as if it were something you'd find (especially) in a sewer is pretty pathetic rhetoric.
Drink beer.Play for 2 hours.All sorts of things.
Is it wrong to say I might celebrate by screwing a beaver?
...but it doesn't WORK. Saydrah can still spam because she apparently isn't affected by the time limit.  Fuck, are you colossal retards actually going to address the complaint that's been raised? Or are you going to continue attempting to shift attention onto other subjects?
The problem with these statements is that the terms used are loaded. Academic *history* cannot accept that which is fundamentally impossible for man (i.e., the miracles, Jesus' divinity). *Myth* is a term used to describe ancient incredible stories that have found embellishment and developed over time, that may or may not have factual elements to them. They're categories for describing accounts of the past.  Surely most Christians and non-Christians can then say that the accounts of Christ have both historic and mythical elements to them?
With a team that deep, Sid didn't need to be the best player on that team every night.  But when we needed him most, he came through.
You can upvote for visibility, when viability is less of an option.
Would you believe that most of what you just described is directly from Lurianic Kabbalah and in fact many Hassids would say the same thing? ^_^
Is that Plushenko, the Russian figure skater?
Dude, those two games took far too many years off of my lifespan. I couldn't survive a tie-breaker game.
Don't take my words out of context--there was an "if" before all of that.  I would be surprised if it's not true, though, considering that debug kits for consoles (including 360, PS3, Wii, and DS) are super-expensive.
Yeah, I've been on the other end of that - my last gf ended up cheating on me with her crying-shoulder, who apparently thinks I'm the devil incarnate. Yay!
i agree completely
I'm reserving judgement...but it's pretty damning when she brags in a  "resume" that she is an expert in driving traffic on websites like Reddit (mentioned explicitly), mentions cultivating a following in a way that purposely evokes the image of someone cynically herding people towards sites, and then also mentions that she is paid to drive traffic to sites (or seeks employment driving traffic to sites).
Pussy payments; better than American Express!
Guns are from a less civilized time.
Saydrah submits quality content, is a responsive moderator, and has never given me any reason to suspect her of abusing her privileges. Whether or not she gets paid to submit to reddit, she is no spammer. If she was, her submissions would receive primarily downvotes, not upvotes.  It seems to me that Saydrah is a good moderator and a good member of the reddit community.
A wonderful melody of love!
Azureus doesn't categorically suck, it is just the unreasonably slow/memory hungry.
Broken Angels, Richard K Morgan
The bi-armed witch is falling, while the failed broomstick shoots into the sky.  Hats off to you, photographer! 
I hope after reading this post you understand how out of place you stand. Almost all so called free websites make money through ads (which itself is directly related to eyeballs). Complaining about reddit being slow is something we are totally entitled to. Reddit is what it is because of its users - not because of its founders. We have worked hard to make reddit a healthy discussion and link sharing web site and we want to speak out when it is not working. When reddit is down, it makes me quite helpless which of course, you would not understand, and complaining about it is one way I can take out my frustration (in the hope that someone will hear and fix the site). Quit reddit - it is not a place for you; rather we do not want people like you to be present here. The pun was intended.  EDIT: Grammar
You just reminded me of the fact that I was too busy to go to Devin Townsend this weekend. I missed out on the demons :(
Too bad i'll never buy/support a device that requires proprietary applications to use. IIRC you can't use an ipod touch without first setting it up via iTunes
so i'm still not sure... did segway change the way humans live and work?
One does not simply ssh into Mordor. It's black ports are guarded by more than just firewalls. There are daemons there that do not sleep. The great root is ever watchful. It is a barren wasteland, riddled with spyware, trojans, and worms. The very bytes you read are poisoned code. Not with ten thousand users could you do this. It is folly. 
You're an idiot.
http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/b7l9g/if_you_are_tired_of_reddit_being_slow_you_might/  Too many postings about too many postings
Party pooper.
We are still British subjects, I don't think you understand that; we can celebrate British military victories. Not to mention, many of the British soldiers who fought the war of 1812 settled in Canada.
Associated Content? That explains it. I vote down everything to that blog spam site. 
WHEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!! FUCK YEAH CANADA!!!!!!!!
&gt;Nothing resembling this has yet happened in Germany  ...  &gt;The USA is unique in both sheer numbers and the depth of the injustices perpetrated against its own population.  You've got to be fucking kidding.  The holocaust and the third reich in general undermines your entire argument.
Is it easy for foreign students to get in? How is the rigor of the curriculum compared to U.S.? In another AMA, a poster was saying French and Spanish medical schools on the whole are just OK. 
case in point ^^
Isn't the whole point of a moderator to "moderate what the community should see"?  After all, if somebody is irrelevant/disrespectful/annoying/trolling/whatever, it's their job to get rid of it.
Latch key kids are my favorite subject.  Good luck with that Introversion :)
Hey im not saying they do this right away, I posted this for a discussion. Seemed most are opposed to the idea...
&gt;hen you ask a few thousand random Americans, and none of them know, then you can reasonably conclude that most Americans don't know either. First off you start your point off with a "fact" and no data to back it up.  You are basing the entire next part of your sentence on a fact that doesn't even exist.  What a way to make a terrible point.  And let humor you and say it WAS true, it simply makes them ignorant of geography, not science, history, culture etc.  People can be ignorant in certain areas of knowledge but not as a whole.
They aren't selling our content, if that were true they would have to have page-view/click based reddit owned advertisements on the page of each individual link.  Reddits advertising model isnt even directly linked to pageviews/clicks in general.  This isnt google AdSense, most peoples assumptions about reddit advertising are wrong.  Nobody forces you to share your content here either.  A good number of people dont even share original content.  Its an extremely flawed argument. You give up plenty your rights by submitting to their terms of service by signing up for an account anyways.  Dont like it? dont use it.  Whining gets us nowhere.  You wana fix it? Reddit is open source... download the code and host it on your own server if you think you can do better.  and dont bitch unless you have a solid solution.  That's all i've been trying to say.  I dare someone to link me to one single constructive comment in any of the 4 self posts about todays slowness.
Okay, so there is now [one virus](http://news.techworld.com/security/5392/worlds-first-os-x-virus-hits-apple/) that effects OS X, and it doesn't do anything other than replicate itself.
CA, in San Francisco. Though in comparing my almost half and half private and public school upbringing to my boyfriend's complete public school upbringing in a suburb of Sacramento, I have to say my education was pretty lacking growing up. It's not surprising things like the plasma state of matter wasn't mentioned until college.
The erections.
lol i'd ask steven hawkings if it is bad news. he thinks we should keep our heads down..cased on experience on how we treat less advanced people.. and they are our own species.
So how do you interpret that verse ?
Isn't that what we said about the Newton?
but facebork made their own php now, and it is a buggy piece of siht but it g0es fast!
[Here's](http://www.reddit.com/r/amiugly/comments/avy4j/unnatural_redhead/) my other post.
Another American weighing in.  Well done neighbor to the north!  However, as a Flyers fan, did it have to be Crosby?  Sheesh...
The funny thing was all of the adults knew what it meant and I didn't because I was young. My family is demented, love them though.
Sound's like Greece has no problem then, all fixed!
I understand what you're trying to say, but frankly, you have no idea what you're talking about. You're taking a sociological concept and warping it to the point where walking down a sidewalk is directly responsible for the corruption of society. That is absolutely absurd. Please go study sociology or psychology, learn what the hell it is you are trying to sound intelligent enough to argue for, and then come back when you have a valid point to make. Otherwise, you are contributing nothing to this topic.
Aye, fight and you may die. Run, and you'll live... at least a while. And dying in your beds, many years from now, would you be willing to trade *all* the days, from this day to that, for one chance, just one chance, to come back here and tell our enemies that they may take our pancakes, but they'll never take... OUR FREEEEEEDOMMMMMMMM!
Many of those states have massive minority populations. Why do you hate brown people?
it takes 100 years for an average global temperature to rise for 1 or 2 C. Europe (and north apart of North America) is going to get net benefit from such rise. Of course, tropical area is going to feel adverse effect immediately. But only after like 200 years, the adverse effect will be global.   So if you live in developed countries, you can pretty much rationalised away Climate Change. 
I'm not denying there's important stuff about love in there. There's also a great deal of miraculous healings and casting out of demons. But I think the main focus of his ministry is the Kingdom of God.  EDIT: Indeed, just have a look at the beginning of the very chapter you cite:  &gt;Once more Jesus spoke to them in parables, saying: "**The kingdom of heaven may be compared to** a king who gave a wedding banquet for his son. He sent his slaves to call those who had been invited to the wedding banquet, but they would not come. Again he sent other slaves, saying, "Tell those who have been invited: Look, I have prepared my dinner, my oxen and my fat calves have been slaughtered, and everything is ready; come to the wedding banquet.' But they made light of it and went away, one to his farm, another to his business, while the rest seized his slaves, mistreated them, and killed them. The king was enraged. He sent his troops, destroyed those murderers, and burned their city. Then he said to his slaves, "The wedding is ready, but those invited were not worthy. Go therefore into the main streets, and invite everyone you find to the wedding banquet.' Those slaves went out into the streets and gathered all whom they found, both good and bad; so the wedding hall was filled with guests. "But when the king came in to see the guests, he noticed a man there who was not wearing a wedding robe, and he said to him, "Friend, how did you get in here without a wedding robe?' And he was speechless. Then the king said to the attendants, "**Bind him hand and foot, and throw him into the outer darkness, where there will be weeping and gnashing of teeth**.' For many are called, but few are chosen." (Matthew 22:1-14)
Awesome! I was thinking last night about doing this too!  I did door-to-door from last August to Thanksgiving.  The work I did was a lot let credible. I sold cleaner. Yes, I know, say what you will, but it was a ticket out of a city I hated and away from a load of people I couldn't stand. The only bad thing was the people I had to live with on the road weren't much better.  The best part of it was talking to tons of people every day. Most were morons, but a couple times a week I met a truly great person. Some were famous but most unknown. Some were extremely rich and some in extreme poverty.  Who was the most famous person you met? Did you sell them?  Mine is J.L. Oxford, who I met in Red Oak, TX. I know you probably don't recognize the name, but he was the lead detective in Dallas on the Kennedy Assassination. He escorted Lee Harvey Oswald out of the court house when Jack Ruby shot him. He is the man in the white hat in the video. We didn't talk about the assassination. We talked about Brady, TX, the place I grew up and where Mr. Oxford was going to that very day to do some deer hunting. It wasn't until I got to the neighbors that I remembered the name as familiar and the neighbor confirmed it.  Also, did you really have to be that quick witted to sell energy and telecommunications? With cleaner, we had to be REALLY quick witted.   I loved the work, but I was only moderately successful because I refused to lie to people and I refused to annoy people who obviously had no time for me or obviously had no money to give me. I concluded that door-to-door sales is basically glorified begging. Rich people will shell out to you if they like you and see you working hard. Middle class people will buy if they need it and poor people will buy if you impress them.  I gained extremely valuable experience during my time in the business, but I'll never sell cleaner door-to-door again. I would go door-to-door though, but I'd want it to be a product that's not just an overpriced alternative to what is in stores sold in bulk.
I don't know... I'd guess his fingers would be a bit discoloured
I wish I knew how to spell trollface right now. Downvoted for being bitchy... Problem?
OPTION 3 ... SEX WITH ME
"Advanced Task Killer" should be called "Advanced Time Waster. Micromanagement of tasks if NOT necessary in Android and is, frankly, a complete fucking waste of time. When you apps is not visible, it's STOPPED and not using any CPU or battery unless the app has registered a background service process to do things like play music or download data. People really need to learn a bit about the Android application lifecycle and stop perpetuating this myth that you need to waste time micro-managing your tasks.  See here for more information on the Android process lifecycle: http://developer.android.com/guide/topics/fundamentals.html#proclife
I swear Chatroulette is doing this on purpose!
(takes a sip from a goblet made from a human skull) Yes, no one knows, Muh hah hah hah!
The people who accuse us of being promiscuous and unable to maintain a relationship are the same people who will not let us marry when we want to. 
I wouldn't open a store or anything but for just buying and selling things here and there I have no problems.  No way in hell I'd trust them to hold money though. Wikileaks learned this the hard way ;)
This a million times. 
i stare at my toaster
The sad thing is he's right but people highlight parts and say they are wrong.  Example: Snow in America for a few weeks this winter doesn't mean the other 98% of the globe isn't experiencing warmer temps.  The arctic ice is shrinking.  It's not gone yet, and that's a good thing.   I could go on, but why?  **It just doesn't matter.  Some people will never believe climate change is happening, and that's OK.**
Oh, I didn't mean... I'm happy enough with the figure skaters.
Don't forget emotion.
You missed the memo, apparently over the last few days somewhere it was decided that being obnoxious and ungrateful is standard behaviour around admins when Reddit lacks features/has downtime/is slow/doesn't make your coffee in the morning.  Clearly the OP needs to consider the true implications of his phrase "dismissive snob", preferably whilst taking a good old look in the nearest mirror (@OP: if you can't find one, turn off your monitor. As a nice side-effect, it'll stop you posting).
poke it, sir! Poke it!
Okay, am I nuts, or is there a naked guy doing push-ups in most of the pics later in this gallery?  WTF?
Kudos!  Miller was amazing.
That guy is not too sharp.
As a rocket scientist, thanks for the compliment. :)  Good points all. Thanks for the post.
Good analysis. Correct. The cap and trade bill is a fee on polluters (coal) that funds rebates and subsidies to clean energy, AND some to make coal cleaner (at least in greenhouse gases - nothing can make mining coal clean - remember that Waxman-Markey/CEJAPA in the Senate is precisely for capping GREENHOUSE gases)  I wouldn't worry too much about this CCS funding. Once there is a price on carbon, coal dies anyway - we follow Europe (who've had cap and trade for a few years now) and move to renewables and efficiency. It's just icing on the cake. Even though CCS has been shown to reduce Greenhouse gases, there's moves by the EPA now to regulate other emissions from coal - adding them to the SOx and NOx cap and trade program the EPA already administers to bring down acid rain.
ProTip: You can get paid for doing this.
Yes...  It's not grassroots anymore but the original one was.  I've been very clear on that.  Those are the facts.  It is important to know so that people are aware that there is a legitimate conservative movement going on in America and it's not just fox news.
The judiciary has been coopted by the establishment of secret courts.  The Founders would have waged a revolution against anyone who tried bullshit like that. The U.S. has gone fascist.
I got tired of searching for his heart and just lit him on fire.  It was actually a little disturbing the way they had him scream in pain.
Not sadistic, BUT, in planetside, us terran were gettin double teamed off a continent and, as such our squad was somewhat bored of being ganked as soon as we stepped outside, SO, we all went to the control room and completely covered the walls in mines(this took like 20 minutes of 6 of us worknig) and then tossed in a jammer grenade. My monitor went white, the entire continent(several hundred players) crashed and all the bases reset. I was later told that this became common in that game but we were the first to do it... i miss Planetside....
Admit it Canada, if your country didn't border ours, you'd be owned by now. Congrats on the hockey win though.
"Except for the fact that they kill a shitoad of teenagers without thinking about it so they can go boating at a more pleasant lake on the weekend and you're *stupid* enough to agree with that without questioning it because you just like playing the video game?"  You had me believing that your argument was reasonable and this was worth debating until you called me names.  Also, for the record, I don't even play cod games.  I still don't get the connection between kids playing MW2, and joining the army thinking they'll actually play MW2 in real life. I would think boot camp would change that opinion instantly.
Woot we won!
I don't think she was doubting that some people find it funny, I think she was lamenting that some people find it funny.
His belief is that it is a life, but not a human life, or he would not be in favor of its murder under certain circumstances.  There is no question that fetuses are alive, the question is whether they are persons.
But the one they made the movie about *are* the legendary bobsled team.
gold, eh? good job Canada, well deserved.
This is kind of random, but your sentiment reminded me of how the new Fleet Foxes album is supposed to sound.  &gt;even if there are fuck-ups, I want them to be on there. I want there to be guitar mistakes. I want there to be not totally flawless vocals. I want to record it and have that kind of cohesive sound. [Van Morrison's] Astral Weeks, to me, is the best-sounding album because it sounds like there were only six hours in the universe for that album to be recorded in. So I want it to have that feeling.
No Russian.
The only position they had put forward was that they refused to package it because they didn't like PHP. That's why I called it religion.  They later put forward the 'we dont have time' excuse, which would have been fine had they not first played the 'we hate PHP card'.
Couldn't that be true of comment karma and regular karma then? 
So, you've read a lot of other military SF, but not _The Forever War_, which won the Hugo, the Nebula, and the Locus awards?
Look at the size of that TV!
also the best paid.  But yes - if only Canada could win its own game in international play often enough. I'm curious to see how many US players from this year's World Junior championship (who beat Canada) end up in Sochi in 4 years.
&gt;A friend of mine **had** a tree pruning business.  :(
Well it gets my [Seal Of Approval.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VsnKm0kYiFQ)
maybe you're gay?
I can potentially confirm that it is wiping the trophies, I am not sure if i sync'd with the sever recently but none of my heavy rain trophies are visible.  I am hoping they come back once I am able to reconnect to psn.
What does a coroner have to do with finding treasure? 
yeah and we have [Stompin Tom Connors](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uZWxErEbQkY) so that cancels out everything.....triple stamp no erasies
Maybe they can be friends *later*.  They just can't be friends *now*.  The best thing she can do to salvage the friendship later is to draw boundaries and not let them treat her like shit.  If they realize they won't get her as a plaything to be mean to, AND they don't get her as a friend unless they're nice, *maybe* they'll start to be nice and actually apologize... at which point your sister can maybe get her friends back.  More likely they won't.  But it might be an easier sell to your sister.
Yes, you have a nice bod, but did you \notice, your profile looks very similar to john lenon's??
Isn't that like crossing the beams?
Is that what you kids are calling it these days?
Sarcasm.  That is a drag chute.  I'm curious why are they jumping tandem.
I would always make a shuttle-loop that wasn't quite long enough and i would fire a roller-coaster of people off the end and JUST before they were pancaked into the ground i would hit the red stop light thing twice to reset the ride so that i would feel benevolent.
I do not approve 
[Wild man](http://henrysheehan.com/essays/def/eastwood.jpg) | [Domesticated man](http://www.gossipcheck.com/blog/wp-content/uploads/2009/08/ashton-kutcher.jpg)  I think you're onto something here...
Thanks for posting. I listened, and I can't say anything about your songs struck a chord with me. I love instrumental hip-hop (RJD2, Blockhead, Kraddy, DJ Frane, edIT etc.) and just found your beats and sound very generic. Tell me a bit about your process - what inspires you to make these beats?
Wine?  Really?  There are some acid attacks in other countries we should probably be paying attention to.
Would you prefer 'cumbucket'? 
That is weird. All I can say is that I *can't* hear it in Bruce Buffer's voice.
I really like the look of a lot of pierced nipples, but I was not sure I wanted my girl to have them done.  I suggested she get one done so we could give it a test drive to see if we liked it.  She insisted on doing both.  She has rather large barbells and I think they get in the way too much. It is even worse than I imagined it would be.  I always have to be concerned about what angle to approach them, how much pressure to use.  I really don't like a hard metal bar in the middle of something that used to be soft and chewy, and I hate the feeling of something metal clanging against my teeth.  With all that being said, I have had some nice experiences with some very small hoops that did not seem to cause as many barriers to enjoyment.
That's just crazy enough to work!
Wait...you can PAY for it?
Hating or criticising a religion is not racist. She got raked over the coals because she criticised Islam and its backward beliefs.  I'd go further and say that anyone who doesn't criticise religion (particularly one as backward as Islam) is morally suspect.
if I tried that in a washroom sink, it would tear right off the wall
People feel betrayed because someone who they believed was a genuine part of the community turned out to be doing it for money.  It's like finding out one of your best friends actually got paid to encourage you to hang out at this particular bar -- maybe he's a really great friend, but you don't know how much you can trust him now it turns out the friendship's built on something beyond sincerity. (Don't kill me now, but the Matthew McConaughey movie *Failure to Launch* is premised on this idea.)  Is this outrage out of proportion? Maybe. I don't feel anything visceral about it, personally. But I can see why others would. This undermines the trust people have in the community and its longstanding members.
I don't have Windows on my machines at home or at work, but I concede that most people do.  How does VS Express stack up next to the big-name Java IDEs?  I seem to remember that a couple of years ago, VS didn't have automated refactorings, but I'm not certain of that.
No. I think nature is just doing what it's always done.
And this is why there's a good chance McCain will lose his own primary.  The Republican party has gone off the deep end.
true story about the legal issues.  There is legal stuff you can smoke that is basically plant matter sprayed with a chemical that is pretty close to the canabanoid structure.  It gets you pretty much the same high with no jailtime!  Niceeeeeee...   Try serenity now if you can find it.  That's the brand that I use and it works well ;)
&gt; [So yea](http://www.reddit.com/r/Freethought/comments/b7ind/when_the_nets_wisdom_of_crowds_turns_into_an/c0lcq8s), when some of us associate with each other, we revile in it. It's not a "lynch mob".  &gt; Yea, that article is itself a kind of lynch mob of generalization.  Made me *chuckle*, but I took it all the right way I assure you.  ^_^
I live in the South, if you gonna carry a stick, hit someone with it!! Otherwise it just appears to be a bunch of people skating around and unable to make up their minds about right of way etc...
I'm not much or a regular season watcher.....but playoff hockey is awesome.
No that's Hathor the Egyptian goddess of fertility, inebrity, and music.
ROFL, one of my EXs actually used to do that to tease me; the wanker.  Well either than or just sit there doing nothing.  I teased him a lot too, so it's not like I didn't deserve it.  I think you know what I mean though, friction alone is good enough for most guys.  With girls the friction has to be just the right amount in the right place(s).  :-)
Hemingway didn't. He actually lost respect for Fitzgerald when he wrote about his feelings.
:popcorn:
Changing the comment system will not change who is commenting.  Fark, by far, has the most developed thread set up, but it's ruined by trolls and more trolls, lately.  That's Farks problem as they're losing good posters because they're letting their site be overrun by trolls under the misguided idea that it will improve the number of clicks they are getting.   The idea that improving the comment system will somehow degrade the the quality of posts is logically unsound. 
The M44 carbines were sighted in with the bayonets extended. Those will make a difference, at distance, shooting with it folded. The long rifle will have been sighted in without the bayonet attached. 
No actually I think your on to something, what do we need families for? In my case they drive me crazy but I love them to death, and I have a very very large family. What about those who are without families? Are they doomed to eternal misery? If you happen to be stuck with abusive parents and your brother is Charles Manson, aren't you better off without your family?
TimeWarner can suck it, literally.  I still owe them ~ 500$ from about 3 years ago. They took forever to send out a non time warner technician to set up my tv/internet.  The guy left, internet didn't work, and TV would freeze up all the time.   Called back, a week later, an actual TW tech comes and literally tells me "the other guy had no idea what he was doing," sets it up, and leaves.  Internet works but is nearly unusable during peak hours, about 56k speeds sometimes, around 3-5 in the morning it would be halfway decent but still horrid.  TV would work for a few days at a time, and then start freezing and disconnecting us as which time we would have to call the automated # to get our box reset.  At least once a week we would call to reset the box 4+ times a night. Once again a tech comes out, states that the "modem levels" are fine but wont acknowledge speed tests.  Adds a power booster going to the TV, leaves.  Nothing really improved, TV may have worked a little better but same hassle as always.  I spent at minimum 100 hours on the phone with them trying to solve the problem over the course of a year and continually talked to retards who had no idea what they were doing or could help.  I would literally tell them what to do (work at an internet related company) and get little to no help.  Another tech is requested to come out but I get a "between 8am and 6pm" window and of course miss the tech. This was about 3 months before we were going to be moving out and I decided enough was enough, and I stopped paying.  Late charges etc. ended up getting the bill to about 500$ but its been sitting in collections for a while now.  I received calls for about a year to pay it and every time asked them to pull up my service record and would ask the lady "would you pay for service you didn't get?" at which time they would generally just work their way off the call.  I am sure I am probably screwing myself by doing this but fuck it, I really just don't give a shit.
FreeThoughtPedia.com: [Priest Abuse](http://freethoughtpedia.org/wiki/Priest_Abuse)
When I was about five years old I stuck my head through the bars over the aquarium at bass pro to get a better view of the fish... but it turns out that my ears were freaking gigantic and I couldn't get my head out afterward.  So my mom starts screaming for my father and yanking me by my ankles to get me out of these bars but to no avail.  Then this freaking gigantic guy steps out of the crowd that had now gathered around the shrieking woman almost decapitating her child and he yanks the bars apart.  The next time we returned to the store... the bars had been replaced with bars about 2 inches apart and there was a sign above then that read "Famous Bar".  Worst story of my life D :
lol nicee
SICK.
I remember going to school, and my teachers asked the class how to spell Al-Qaeda, no one got it right because you have to have a u if you have a q in english
I prefer the word *Devastating*. 
I've found Livemocha is really good for learning a language conversationally, but doesn't help a whole lot with the grammatical structure of more complex languages--I'm speaking in particular about Russian, which has very difficult and intricate declensions and rules--so it was not great for really mastering a language.  Still, for a free tool, it really can't be bested.
Full Disclosure - I am The Beard and I wrote this article. I am no "saydrah" type, I'm just someone who loves Formula 1 and happens to vent my nonsensical ramblings to a website from time to time.
[Suddenly, every TV screen on the planet flickers to life](http://robotandghost.com/wp-content/gallery/2008/2008-05-26-TheArmada.jpg)...
I moved and lost all my connections.
It costs us $40 a ton in health effects alone apparently
And I did it mainly to be a smart ass but also because I always find it paradoxical that people bitch in their headlines about other people bitching in their headlines.
He was signing for Bush in a Presidential capacity.
Is it fat?  Sometimes overweight cats have difficulty with feline hygiene matters.
? not quite sure where you're getting with this. Am I missing something? What comes to mind is gaming the system in the UK? :[
I think he's pointing out that you seem to have an excuse for EVERYTHING when it comes to showing that you're actually doing what you claim to be doing.  Considering that you're making those claims it's your responsibility to back them up, and until that happens we're well within our rights to assume you're doing nothing but ignoring/laughing at this whole situation.
Gore isn't "investing his money",  he's fronting for a global mafia that wants to control the multi-trillion dollar carbon-trading bourse that would be instituted under cap &amp; trade.   BTW,  did you know that Gore's inlaws financed the murder of 40 million people in the early 20th century?    Thought not.
I can almost promise you that it had everything to do with the reddit power user explosion (Saydrah outed as spammer) that happened this AM.  Lost of crazy self-referential posts leading back and forth between MASSIVE comment threads.
yeah i doubt dolphins will invent fire.. .
my girlfriend.... i wish
NO. Interplay published Descent. This looks more like EarthSiege or ES2.
.Its no't his fault hes go't punctuated dyslexia
AND WE WON GOLDDDDDDD
You're an idiot. I never even heard of Saydrah before this thread, as he does not post in any subreddits I normally read. The Saydrah comment that the submitted rant is responding to is in fact perfectly reasonable.  Speaking of sockpuppets, how are you enjoying your 11 day old reddit account?
Disclaimer: don't use Reddit for medical advice, seek a second/third opinion.
That's less of a rule than conventional wisdom likes to think. Most of the smartest and most successful people in the world have refused to do something for their customer at least once. Sometimes it is a cornerstone of their business strategy.
I disagree, it is never too late to protest, and new powers of surveillance continue to be sought and must be resisted.
&gt;information   LOLOLOLOLOL
hahah
3) ?????  4) Profit
Nah, I don't even turn on my tv on saturday mornings.  I do miss my old nicktoons though: Rocko's Modern Life, pre-dill Rugrats, AHHH! Real Monsters, Angry Beavers, Hey Arnold!, and Doug.
To SOME married couples. Ftfy 
You might want to try 5-HTP if you're off of SSRIs.
macro #showtooltip Maul /cast Maul /cast Swipe   Spam that, invest in the Maul glyph if you haven't. Use FFF every time it's off CD.  Agh.  I hate the formatting on reddit.
Makin' love for... Twooo minutes....
Cutest infestation ever. 
Nah, just putting the characters into a 3D program wouldn't give accurate demonstrations without a lot of work and effort to match the in game mechanics. What I suspect he's done is that he's made a green screen custom map that's just a flat shaded green room that is easy to key out in post production software like After Effects or Nuke.
To be fair, I'm pretty sure that their would be obnoxious people like that no matter who won tonight.
without IP protection, there is no incentive for scientists to find new innovations  this is what separates capitalist countries like the United States from socialist countries like China
amaar only?
You understand wrong.
Stay classless, Jason Kidd.
This is a terrible, stupid article full of poorly-considered assumptions and opinions.  Also, stuff like: &gt;If we accept the premise that two intelligent species arose independently on Earth, the inescapable conclusion is that evolution has tried, minimally, two pathways to intelligent life. This would argue that self-aware beings are a common evolutionary watershed on planets capable of sustaining multi-celled lifeforms for hundreds of millions of years. ...makes me want to cry. (I'm not disagreeing that dolphins are intelligent.)
Seems ok....unless you were trying to make toast. In which case, I would have some pointers for you.
It's not a right to get pregnant. It's a woman's right to make decisions with her doctor about what is best for her body, her life, her family. And it's no more obscene or selfish or wrong to take special steps to begin a pregnancy than it is to end a pregnancy. All I'm saying is try not to judge. Unless they also adopting a child, fertile women are just as much part of the problem as infertile women.  (and I do support the right of poor women to seek fertility treatment. I also support their right to use birth control and abortions.)
&lt;http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/A_Modest_Proposal&gt;
disqualification of the female relay team
Nuka-Cola
http://www.google.com/hostednews/ap/article/ALeqM5hJU5AjfcneV6vrwDOcvgOfvNbKPgD9E2QCO01
Not bad dude!
Yeah a bit of an overload but damn it's exciting!!!!
Yeah, she is pretty cool. Very bendy.
oh dotn miind me i am jsut tryin to recvoer my lsot brian cellz aftre waching thosse vidz
I totally agree with you, ___________
"...more sense *than* the..."  EDIT:  I got downvoted for explaining what I meant to say in the title?  I'm more disappointed with reddit everyday.  Sorry people who are reasonable human beings to implicate you in that.
Thanks.   -Canada
Yes, same here. I hate that I can't play Heavy Rain because it fails to sync trophies and has to quit. **EDIT:** Also, I discovered that my clock is broken! Even setting it manually, my clock doesn't advance at all!
Carnivores don't eat unless they run really fast.  All the time.  Herbivores eat food that doesn't move. No but you're right, it doesn't make you skinny; it just increases the odds.
What!!! You mean somebody from the party of "NO" finally admitted this. Amazing.
Best time to shop for hardware ever. The stores were empty.
go dumpster diving behind any major appliance store. you'll find a big enough box soon enough.
this review pwns
Or Genesis 19:36  It would be a nice trolling effort.
In place partial checkouts that can be treated as a valid point to commit changes and perform operations on a repository.  Take 30 interdependent projects, each with their own code.  I want to be able to work on only 1 at a time, or 30, without having to do a full clone for each new one I have to work with and without worrying about the full pull for starting state.  I use git for personal projects, but large, inter-dependent projects at work make git painful to use unless you use a repository per project, and that has more headaches than CVS.
The website I was browsing called this the "hi res" version.  I guess that's part of what's funny about my submission but I think most people get a kick out of the fact that's it's simply green.  Personally, I think it's one of the better flags out there.  I wish the US flag were simpler, it's very difficult to replicate by hand because of those 50 stars.  With this, all you need is a green crayon.
I don't know that it's rotten...I think it's adequate --- I'd much rather use Ruby (independent of Rails) than PHP though.
"Learning HOW to learn", by that I take it you mean "learning how to be force fed and not ask questions", the education system in the UK isn't education, it's indoctrination through and through.
And dsome of the comments are priceless
What do you mean drag? I don't think there was one shitty episode in all of season seven. Even the next to last episode where Neelix gets off the ship was damn decent. 
Why do I know less? Did we take an exam? Did I fail? Does this mean I can't play on the basketball team? I'm "belittling" you because you're insulting, arrogant and presumptive. I totally agree: You are a punk.
I'm the first to upboat you, what do I get?
More like this is what happens when someone plays the fool and successfully scams a nation into two wars and billions in profit for he and his friends.
&gt;When you suck a string of spaghetti up into your mouth, is the spaghetti in tension or compression?  That would be pulling a string, not pushing. There is tension acting on the part of the spaghetti outside the mouth, and a limited zone of compression where the bit inside is pushed further inside before flopping around. This does not invalidate the general concept that you can't push a string.
People for the Interesting Treatment of Animals  http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/b7jch/im_all_out_of_money_will_this_cover_it/
Yonge street in Toronto is CLOSED DOWN!!! There's people crowdd surfing!!
Oh snap. An online bitch-slap.
Microsoft should sue Obama.
I wish I could say it makes me feel better, but no, it just sucks :(
It was a great game. Had the US won, I'm sure their would be just as many submissions about that.
There's no visible gore, just bodies where you can barely see any skin. I'm not sure what country you live in, but it's very sad that you would get in trouble at work for viewing this photo. It's double-sad if you live in the US, which is most likely where those soldiers are from.
I think I am old, because I remember Craig hosting KCBA Kids Club cartoon afternoons with Diana Ruiz (who ended up marrying Clint Eastwood).
DOWNLOAD MORE RAM.  http://www.downloadmoreram.com/
I downvoted you because I read Cryptogirl's link below. You have probably met plenty of women who are supportive of men's rights but didn't notice it because you were too distracted by your own hateful stupidity.
I think you have picked a particularly bad example of hoops and though the barbells look nice, they get in the way when trying to play with an otherwise perfectly good nipple.
(Assuming most people going through SF training are American)  Is it disconcerting to anyone else that our special forces are trained with songs encouraging violence against the U.S. civilian population?  I'd prefer chants about killing terrorists rather than the kids at your local school.
Nope. You eat, you piss, you take a crap, you fuck. Which one is the most important?   You, younger than I crack me up. Fuck whomever you feel like, but be responsible. Use condoms. I am such an asshole for telling the truth. Most everything is a construct. Constucts are created and usually against our nature, specifcaly against females.
No, because she's a smug female asshole.
I'm riding on a dolphin
Take that, fucking creationists.
He did it when it counted most.
cool story bro
In the UK, on the non-BBC channels there'll be an ad break every 15 minutes. So if there was a show running for an hour, it'd be S-ad-H-ad-O-ad-W-ad, with each series of ads lasting about 3 minutes. So that's about 15 minutes of ads per hour, and we don't have an ad break *right after the start of a show* like some of your networks do. I think the reason you have such terrible TV is because enough people put up with it, if our ads got that annoying people would just watch more BBC.
Amazing. This city is going crazy. It's something i don't think i'm ever going to experience again in my life. 
The title of this bible chapter deals specifically with the behavior of women.  To say that it is applicaple to everyone equally seems like a radical stretch of an interpretation.
derp
Yeah that's right, BEP. Keep asking a totally irrelevant question. That's how you win an argument, see? Drag attention away from it!
It's brother-sister.  Guess I just want to hear from him sometimes and hear about his life.  I am younger by two years.  Neglected was probably the wrong word to use.  He's probably just busy and of course we live across the country, but I don't know.  This not talking really has been going on for a while, but maybe it's just the distance.  Just wondering if he's mad or not interested or if it's normal!
I can't wait till 2013 to laugh at and ridicule all the idiots trembling in fear of their own ignorance.
Bend your knees. 
Similar to your story. In roller coaster tycoon, I built a roller coaster that my guests could ride for free! Needless to say, they flocked to it like Redditors to their breakfast bacon. Upon exiting the ride, they found themselves trapped on a small island that housed both a stand that gave out free drinks, and bathrooms that cost $15 per person.  Mwahahahahaha.
i bought a cheep one based on the same idea. i had to put a dimmer on mine as well. i'm still not impressed. you have to buy heddies to make it worth it and i'd rather save money, get a better buzz, by rolling an old school j with some decent middies
That's one big **If**!
Oh definitely--a lot of the people who do that are complete douchebags trying to make themselves look smart. But it's not always the case.
Hey! You stole that from my dick!
Yeah it's not like they're making FAT FUCKING LOOT off of us or anything!
Can you tell usvmore? Was this in the will? In his bedroom. Left to you or all of us collectively?
Geography is my Achilles heel.  I had no idea what was wrong.
&gt; Don't worry. I'll fight them if they do. You are right (as long as by ''tend to'' you meant ''do'').  Well yes, if you twist the semantics then he's right. So why not say what the real factual answer is then? FF cameras "tend to" have shallow depth-of-field, because FF users "tend to" use longer focal length lenses/larger physical aperture lenses with them, which is the real cause behind the dof change.
CANADA!
If you are living your life according to how the people on Reddit think you should live, then this is by far the least of your problems....
Well I have rather small nipples so they actually had to go down under my nipples instead of through.  For me it was really painful because on one they went too far under and went through a nerve.  I actually had to take mine out because they went too deep but if you have good sized nipples then you shouldn't have any problems because then they can go through instead of under.  Have you ever had any other piercings?  Honestly I think I would've been able to keep them had I gotten them done one at a time.  Mine were having trouble healing which is why I had to take them out but I'm sure if I'd gotten one down and let it heal then get the other it would've worked out better.
Nothing will be more entertaining then the bedroom of a nice hotel hint hint.
I'm an anarchist and I don't think that humanity is inherently good.
Every place with any sort of moderation gets waves of mod hatred semi-regularly. Sometimes it's deserved, often time it's just someone who was on the wrong side of them deciding that louder complaints are better complaints. 
How can one "misinterpret" the words *she must be silent*
Thanks for sharing.
I was watching that "48 hours" reality show - and the one guy who did not talk to the cops in the interrogation room was also the one guy from the cases they showed that WENT FREE because they "did not have enough evidence to make a case stick".  They didn't explain that the reason they had not enough evidence was because he came, sat down, listened, and then said "Sounds like you're accusing me, it wasn't me, I want my lawyer." I was reminded of the Never Talk to the Police video.  It works. 
I've always wanted to like Saydrah-- she made a really good post about a year ago and I friended her, and a lot of people seem to like her. But since I've friended her and I always see her comments, I've just never found myself warming up to her-- I don't know why. On the bright side, this means I'm not disillusioned right now.
Proto-nadians. 
looks 'shopped to me. perhaps not. usually the tile ad and that banner ad are related, non?
It's not news to report things that haven't gone wrong.
even if you don't believe in global warming, wouldn't it be great to invest money in the US on alternative fuels, instead of sending it overseas to OPEC? 
Not today, thank you kindly.
I guess until we can see a ratio of posts then there is no reason to get upset. If she's posting like 1 paid link per 100 other links.   Then I don't see what the big deal is, seems most people are just jealous and want to be able to do it too.  I don't think she's purposely inserted herself into reddit purely for spamming links. There are easier ways to go about it.   She seems genuinely interested in the community and helping.   But I guess until the cold hard facts come out about the ratio of paid versus non-paid just stuff she finds interesting then I could give a fuck all. 
That's exactly what I use... best setup ever!
Your comment wins a gold medal.
Karmanaut
and a few cheap penalties, but easily forgiven now.
Friend - Exploit?  If this is really a friend why would you even think about exploiting this?
i guess i see your point, that is kinda crazy, everyone uses those email services...
Don't those dig into your hand? 
politician?
HA! Got you! When you take a shot at the username, it's because the content of my post has nothing you can respond to. It's a cheap shot and a change of subject.  I win.  PS: where do you live? I'll put the address on Craigslist so that all the illegals in your country know where to go for a softie who'll help them out.
Just what Atheism needs... A heirarchy and churches...
You mean the creator of the reddit can't remove a moderator by himself? Is that a rule or is just technically not possible?
Pretty much. My dad's close by and I have an aunt and 2 cousins in Amsterdam.. It's scary, but exciting and full of potential too..
Nice facts linking an article from 2004.
Let's cut them some slack, they were obviously disappointed and it showed, but it's not like any of them refused their silver medal or did anything disrespectful.  
Why are you leading them on then?
I agree, Sidney Crosby is a tremendous player but I wish that he wasn't the one who scored the goal.
I've heard "Crosby Factor" mentioned a few times, but nothing about Canada being his team
Well this affects *brightness*, but it won't inherently change the depth of field you preview through the viewfinder.
Check the downvoted comments for us deniers.
Same here, I just checked and all my Heavy Rain trophies are gone.
I don't care about the "be a man" part of it, but I think all human beings in modern society should have the following list of skills before they enter adulthood: - how to balance a checkbook  - how to change oil in a motor vehicle  - how to save  - how to invest  - how to cook at least a few basic, healthy meals that taste good  - how to shoot/maintain a gun  - how to use said gun to acquire meat  - how to grow your own veggies to go with that meat So yes, I shoot guns.
She's a woman not a girl, you misogynist pig! Stop the culture of infantilising grown women!
Hi Saydrah.
What does the government have to do with something you find in your yard?
Paging mister [Machiavelli](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Prince). Mister [Nicolo Machiavelli](http://ebooks.adelaide.edu.au/m/machiavelli/niccolo/m149p/chapter18.html), please contact the information desk.
Oh gosh I loved Idiocracy. I had my youngest when I was 32. The only problems I had was gestational diabetes but I'm hypoglycemic so it was too be expected.   I have a friend who had a baby a few days ago and she's 36. Other friends have had babies when they were in their 30s. One was 35 and the other was 36 or 37. The only complications any of my friends had were conceiving.   Edit: I don't think there is a cause/effect between hypoglycemia/GD. What I meant was that since I already had problems controlling my blood sugar I wasn't surprised to find out I had it. I'm not a doctor or a medical professional, I'm just stating my experience. 
I thought NBC wasn't going to make a profit from the Olympics...
I leave annotations, because some authors actually use them to provide useful interjections, instead of shameless plugs.  It's like turning off javascript: Yes, it gets rid of some of the stuff I hate, but it also breaks some things that I find useful.
Where's the joke explainer? I didn't get that..
If it were up to me, Rush's radio show would be televised from his multi-million dollar residence by his swimming pool.
Her [Linkedin](http://www.linkedin.com/in/jelenawoehr) page says Greater Denver Area of Colorado.
Okay, but where does this article say anything about being sued?  As far as I can tell, you're the only person to mention it.
Buried?  This isn't digg bub.  If you're trying to make a joke, you could hardly have fallen flatter.
He's just bustin' balls.
O, also, the reason the horse shoes or hoops are better than barbells is because they're easier to clean and you can make sure you can clean them completely whereas with barbells it's more difficult
this is why the hockey final is on the last day of the olympics - what a finish!
Cheese is a food produced by the coagulation and maturation of milk.  What is a terrorist?
He did have a track record though...  It was a really shitty one, as a senator.  He voted multiple times against the second amendment there.
INb4 BritishEnglishPolice:  "You're a 10 day old account. Who are you?"  There, now you can get back to providing the dirt :D
He's an amazing young man.  
New age acupuncture.
Yep, as a user of Python in the web, I think, mod\_python should just disappear.
I don't think this could possibly be more wrong. You beat it to video game characters? I think I'm done with this website.
Wish there was a equivalent video for law in australia.
I feel you miss the point, slightly, that account is in their own name, and they have been spamming the links for it all over - an effort that now attracts embarrasment.  This pleases Anonymous
Thanks, but I can't take credit for it; just passing along the info and couldn't find the original-flavor sauce.
Honestly, I can breath half-decently, and it still scares the shit out of me.  I only ever doing it on special occasions now, and even then, only once or twice.  Eating seems no where near as dangerous, there's so much less that can go wrong.   I eat with the wands from Home of Poi. They're a little small, but work great and are super cheap.  Now my copy of *Fire Eating: A Manual of Instruction* just needs to get here...
20%, huh... http://www.alexa.com/siteinfo/reddit.com?p=tgraph&amp;r=home_home
That comment about the bean bag chairs was totally uncalled for.
Exactly!
http://userscripts.org/scripts/show/62243
I love ultra-high-voltage/amperage arcs :D
thanks :)
This is the most Canadian comment I've ever read.  Nice job.
Later, he is going corn-hole that old broad. With his wiener.
Aww, now we have to hear about them bragging about winning their home sport on home ice. I *really* wanted to avoid that. Oh well, congrats!
Fabulous game and a well-deserved win. Way to go, you hosers.
That one too.  Ah thank ya very much
I was going to upvote, until I saw this was posted by **Ostrianiel**.  
&gt;No doubt every fanboy will just talk about how he was good for apologizing, and then proceed to rationalize this. Richard Dawkins - Atheism's new Jesus Christ can do no wrong.  How nice of you to preemptively judge atheists for idolizing a man that most have been anything but worshiping during the whole of this incident. 
&gt; You make it seem as if you were only friends in the first place because you were interested in dating.  Yes, that's how we got to know one another.  We dated for a while, had sex and all, but it didn't work out.  Once she made her feelings clear, I started to date other people.  She didn't like that, so she responded by making it out like we could get something going again.  Just long enough for me to stop dating the new person.  Then bam, right back to lets be friends.  
Who the hell pads?
if he'd just threaten the gop he'd open investigations they would fall in line quick. Yeah first they would attack him but once he started.. they would STFU.. cause they know where it would lead.
At the moment, NBC is showing 2 minutes worth of ads every 5 minutes.  They've been doing it for at least the last hour.  I've never seen anything like it.  I suspect it has something to do with the coverage of the US/Canada Olympic hockey match.
I actually watched after the game and thought about it... haha
I'm with you on that one lol. Don't think we'll get to Download it till release. 
I was just about to post something in here stating the same thing.  I like to post in this subreddit, but I was beginning to think it wasn't being read.  Maybe we should try to think of a way to increase members of the subreddit and then put it into action.
Remember Alf? He's back! In pog form!
It's not funny, it is to be expected as Europeans drive very little compared to other regions.  Additionally, with increased investment in and usage of public transportation, those who do drive are of a non-comparable population set with regards to such incidents.
[This probably](http://www.reddit.com/r/Buddhism/comments/b7hdj/im_having_trouble_grasping_the_ideas_of_rebirth/c0lcq64).
Nah, Ferby is more of the John Stockton of curling to David Nedhouin's Karl Malone. :P
Combat sports are different, as the absence of judging would allow the combatants to fight until one of them died, or became seriously injured. 
You're going to get a certificate after however much money you spend and have mediocre teachers. Go to Berklee, and if all you want to do is production and you don't care about a college degree, just go for the diploma program. You'll still have to audition to get in, but you'll have teachers who know their shit and were actually successful producers themselves before teaching. Just somethin to think about.
yes, they are God's chosen douchebags
And then they both turn out to be Tyler Durden.
This was really my only weapon in Spore. After a while, you just get pissed at being surrounded with hostile xenophobes and terraform all their planets until they die off. After a while, i started getting depressed that in my rage i killed countless unique species of life whose only crime was contributing to the ecosystems that supported an evil empire. From then on, i always took samples from the planets before i iced 'em.
Meat Loaf - Bat Out Of Hell.  Todd is god.
"/r/atheism - the only place you'll consistently be called "troll" for having an opinion that disagrees with the majority.  Actually that would be every reddit.. and well all of digg... and slashdot.. pretty much any web forum of any kind.  The web seems to foster group think. Is that really much different that than the societies of old that came together for specific goal.  Sadly humans tend to deal poorly with those who disagree with them.
Harder Better Faster Stronger 
When I was 3 or 4 my family was a my parents' friends' house and I reportedly came running up to the adults exclaiming that their son had peed standing up and I had to ask my parents if I was allowed to. They laughed and considering my dad had been trying to teach me this very thing for a few weeks, told me I could. I ran upstairs with a smile from ear to ear.
I don't view it like that at all... my view is consistency applied to all situations.  As I have pointed out in the other threads about this issue, around 4 months ago, [cr3 got his primary account banned](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9wbls/my_redditor_coworkerdoesnt_exist_on_reddit/c0er38w) for viral marketing.  The reason behind the ban was that he, while working at samsung, made and submitted [this link](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/836i6/hey_reddit_samsung_gave_me_24_new_ssd_drives_to/) which currently has over 3000 upvotes.  [here is kn0thing's twitter message about it](http://twitter.com/kn0thing/status/2518074417)  Now, personally, i was kinda pissed.  If someone makes their own content, they should be able to post it, regardless of where it comes from...  However, I figured that reddit wanted to take a hardline stance with regards to spammers trying to promote their own viral content.  And now we find out that this is exactly what Saydrah is doing?  Where's the consistancy.  Personally, I would much rather have someone who admits "hey, i'm from samsung, here's something cool  we made to promote samsung (like theOatmeal is doing), than have someone like Saydrah who posts a ton of links, and we have no idea which ones she's getting paid for.  All I ask is consistency across users.
If this is true lots of people need to be in jail soon &gt;:(
MVP and all, Ryan Miller was crushed and you could see it during the post-game interview.  Talk about carrying the US team throughout the tournament; he's got nothing to hang his head in shame about.  
That's my daughter!
NICE TRY SAYDRAH
That's so kind, thank you :)
Moot
Oh of course you should refuse sometimes, but language evangelism/bashing isn't a valid reason IMO.
So this isn't spamming?  http://i.imgur.com/vxqvR.png
To be fair, I think he'd be hard pressed in finding a flattering picture of her. 
I actually like the idea of devolving and I'm mostly progressive. I would much prefer to send most of my income taxes to my state, rather than the federal government. I am sick of supporting a bloated defense budget and red-state pork, why not?
Stopped myself at "I".
I was thinking that in the "new and upcoming links" section (the post right above #1 on the front page) reddit could also feature popular posts from non-subscribed subreddits.  That way, as a subreddit becomes more popular and its submissions get more and better feedback, the subreddit will naturally get featured to new users by showcasing some of its best stories on the front page.
So if you do it, it's whining, but if they do it, it's bitching? It's called projection, and it always looks bad. 
I have always hear bars recommended to start with.  The curve puts more pressure in places and makes it harder to heal as I understand it, but I am far from an expert.
I started this, but couldn't finish it.  But damn, Chase Masterson looks nice.  Call me babe!!!
or a math book- you never someone say "I agree with the whole dividing and adding thing, but I believe there are multiple interpretations of subtracting"
Hehe yeah, It's the atheists fault.  Die in a fire, christ humper.
1) After you make a small amount of a level, get people to play it. Don't say anything. Just watch them. Don't give them any hints. Watch as they totally misinterpret your design and do what you didn't expect. Go back to your level and fix it.  2) Your QA department will find the level too easy and want more of a challenge. THEY ARE WRONG. They have become experts in the game and can get through it in a jiff. Try the level again with some people you round up at Starbucks to see where they are frustrated.  3) If you want to support advanced players like your QA testers, make a sequel or an add on pack instead.
How many more transplants, do you figure, until you're just an entirely different person?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Edym6_vnjUw  This version only helps one see just how epic it is.
Can we get a Maple Leaf on the alien?
Reddit had some other issues.  Though, I wonder if it wasn't a 4channer fucking with them after the Saydrah shenanigans.
Your risk from all other cars is probably a thousand times greater.
Crosby had 7 points in the 7 games he played....
Yeah I guess so, in the small print it also says you need a girl in a short skirt for the same results as represented above lol
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Z-BzXpOch-E
